<font size="5"><b>Part One</b></font>
[p. <i>[1]</i>]
[p. <i>3</i>]

When I was fourteen, I got drunk for the first time.
Champagne drunk. My mouth was stretched in a smile
so wide that my jaw hurt. The sky had the colours of a
bruise. It was October 1984. Freezing cold and depressing.
I was at my cousin's eighteenth birthday party. Her stepfather
pointed a champagne bottle towards me like a
loaded gun. I watched the bubbles pirouette in the glass.
The champagne picked through my brain like an electrician.
Faulty circuits were re-wired. Loose cables were
soldered. When the repairs were complete, my eyes sang
as beautifully as Billie Holiday.


People always ask, Why did you stop drinking? They
never ask, Why did you start drinking? Just like people
always want to know why you broke up with someone
before they want to know how you fell in love with them
in the first place. I suppose there's some comfort to be had
in other peoples' suffering. I never have any black-and-white
answers. All I can tell them is that there was no
champagne when I stopped drinking, only pain.

[p. <i>4</i>]

No one I have ever met — outside Alcoholics Anonymous
meetings that is — remembers the first time they got drunk
quite as romantically as I do. For me, that night was an
epiphany. Nothing would ever be the same again. I found
a cure for the humming in my head. That nameless,
shapeless humming. And once I knew it didn't have to
be there, my response was only natural: I wanted to stay
cured.


When I was eleven the humming got louder. It was no
longer a single wasp, trapped inside my skull. There were
many wasps, bees too, all humming until there was an itch
inside my brain, an exhausting itch I had no hope of
scratching. The humming wanted to take centre-stage so it
threw a tantrum one morning when my mother was
driving me to school. I'd recently given up smiling. I
was in training for all the other things I'd later give up.
My mother pulled up to the kerb outside the gates. What's
the matter? she asked. You seem so fed up at the moment.
Hum. Buzz. I don't know, I said. This was to be my
mantra for the next fifteen years: I don't know. We talked
a little about why I hated school and why I seemed so sad
all the time. There were no tidy summaries though, no
precise sentences prefaced by ‘I feel’. When I opened the
door, the humming was so loud I couldn't hear her say
goodbye, I could only read her lips.

[p. <i>5</i>]

My childhood up to this point was fairly typical. We lived
in Surrey until I was ten and life there was much the same
as life for any other middle-class family growing up close
to London in the 1970s. My mother stopped working
when she became pregnant with me and stayed home to
raise first me and then my sister, who was born when I was
four. My father worked hard, always leaving before my
sister and I woke up and coming home long after we were
in bed. We spent week nights doing homework and weekends
staying with or visiting grandparents and other
family.


The rest of the time we had TV and Rolling Stones
records and a paddling pool in the back garden in summer
and prayers at bed-time and scary masks for Halloween
and fireworks for Guy Fawkes' Night and swimming
lessons during school holidays and sand-castles on the
beach and homework and ice cream and Sunday afternoons
in winter wrapped in blankets on the living room
floor watching Pink Panther films.


My parents tell me I was a quiet and withdrawn child, at
my happiest hidden away in the corner of a room, writing
a story or drawing a picture. I never really had any friends
— I wasn't interested — and lived mostly inside my head.
Without the distractions of others, I did well at school,
often coming top of my classes. In December 1980, we left
Surrey and moved to a new house in Buckinghamshire,
some twenty-five miles from Central London. A year later,
I passed the eleven-plus exam and got into a local grammar
school. And then, when I was eleven, this humming,
humid and close.

[p. <i>6</i>]

Had you noticed it before? a therapist would later ask.
Not with such clarity, I told her. But I had known from an
early age that there was something different about me,
that something sinister lingered in the shadows of my
everyday, that a dolorous shimmer glowed about me, that
the company I kept was a reflection of the way I felt. This
<i>something else</i> was there when I came home crying
because a classmate at school told me his mother had
died by choking on a piece of bacon rind; it was there
when I befriended a girl at primary school who had five
fingers missing; it was there in the hours I spent obsessing
about the young sad-faced neighbour whose husband had
died in a plane crash; it was there when I was eight and
became close friends with a boy from a school whom no
one would talk to because he had to wear callipers on his
legs; it was there when I wouldn't ride my bicycle beyond a
certain speed because I thought it would give me a heart
attack; it was there when I broke down on the stairs one
Saturday morning because I thought the world was going
to be destroyed by nuclear war. The therapist nodded. So
it was there from the beginning, she said. Yes, I said. I
suppose it was.


When I was seven, I started to talk in my sleep, grind my
teeth and sleepwalk. My parents would find me muttering
nonsense to a wardrobe or trying to open a window that
didn't exist. Once, I hid behind my bedroom door and
jumped out on my father when he came looking for the
source of the banging and crashing sounds that had woken

[p. <i>7</i>]

When I got a bad report card for Maths, my mother made
me a giant times table chart which she hung on my
bedroom wall. We practised sums at bed-time. My
favourite was eight times eight equals sixty-four. Later,
I would tell people that drinking was like multiplying the
slopes and curves of eight times eight, getting drunk the
glorious answer: sixty-four.


It was a hot, sunny day in May or June 1984. School was
lazy, quiet. The exams were over and I, like everyone else,
was looking forward to the end of the summer term. It was
mid-morning. Break was on. I was talking with a friend
out on the playing fields. He said he was thirsty. I said I
craved a freezing-cold glass of Coca-Cola. He gave me an
odd look. I drank two or three glasses every night. My
mother bought big plastic bottles from the supermarket.
I'd come in from school, get my homework done, take a
bath and then head to the refrigerator. It was my favourite
part of each day. I loved to watch the door swing open and
there it would be: a two-litre bottle of Coke shivering in

[p. <i>8</i>]

After getting that drunk at my cousin's eighteenth party,
my parents rarely allowed me to drink any alcohol. They
let me have a small glass of wine with Sunday lunch when
we saw grandparents and they also let me have a small
glass on special occasions such as a birthday or Easter or
Christmas. It was never enough though and I remember
how my throat always drooled, how one glass was never
anything but a tease. How the tiny flash of not feeling like
myself was so incredible, so miraculous, that I'd stare at
the empty glass and dream of a day when I could feel like
that all the time.


When I was fifteen, sixteen, seventeen, Sylvia Plath's <i>The
Bell Jar</i> was my bible. I used to be able to quote entire
passages, my memory word-drunk on the effervescence of
her writing. I read and re-read that book. My head foggy

[p. <i>9</i>]

In autumn 1986, a man who lived across the street from us
died of bowel cancer. He was in his early thirties, had a
Swiss wife and two little daughters who liked to chase
each other around the front lawn. I came home from
school one day and broke down crying at the kitchen
table. My mother was fixing me a cup of tea and a slice of
toast. I was staring at the patterns on the wooden table. I'd
never noticed how the grain of the wood swirled, sometimes
breaking into a spiral, sometimes ordered and curled
like a question mark. What's wrong? she asked. I can't
stop thinking about the neighbour. But you didn't even
know him. That's not the point, I said. What is the point
then? I don't know, I said and covered my face with my
hands.


It was on the school bus that I came to know Ben and Paul
who were both in the same year as me. They lived six
doors apart on a street that ran parallel to mine. We had
no great common bond but routine brought us together

[p. <i>10</i>]

Sixteen years old and munching on the early days of our
A-level courses, we were typical teenagers, arguing with
our parents, nursing crushes on unobtainable older girls,
smoking on the school bus and getting drunk at the only
pub that didn't ask us for ID. We often turned up to school
hung over, stumbled off the bus and rushed into town in
search of cigarettes before the first class of the day. We
pooled loose change from our Saturday jobs and tried a
different brand every day: Camel, Salem, Reyno, Consulate,
Dunhill, Gauloises, Peter Stuyvesant, Marlboro,
Kent, Winston, Parliament ... We smoked our way
through them all like we'd been hired as a focus group
by some marketing guru. And then, on days when we had
no money to buy cigarettes — a cause of arguments on the
bus — I began to see there was beautiful order in addiction.

[p. <i>11</i>]

Robert and I became friends because we shared the same
birthday — 11 June — had pretty much the same record
collections and both played guitar. We had taken to
jamming in each other's bedroom at the weekends. Every
Tuesday night, for reasons I now forget, we bought bottles
of wine and cans of beer and headed to some nearby
deserted woods. There, we drank and smoked and talked
about music. One particular night, I was in a wretched
mood. Fever-pitch humming had me desperate to flee
myself. I bought two bottles of white wine. Robert bought
one. Once we found a good spot, I opened my first bottle
and drank it down in one, no pausing for air, the glug glug
of the vanishing wine pulsating in my ears. When it was
empty, I threw the bottle out into the darkness.


‘Better?’ Robert said, and laughed.


On our way there, probably to make up for my lack of
conversation, he told me how he had crushed an aspirin
tablet on to his parents' kitchen table before coming out
and then snorted it using a five-pound note. When I asked
why, he said he was practising for the day when he could
get some cocaine.


‘Yes,’ I said. ‘Pass me the corkscrew will you?’


‘Show off,’ he said and threw it at me. ‘Who do you
think you are? Keith Richards?’


Robert had taken no more than two sips of his wine. I
popped the cork out of bottle number two.


Later, when the second bottle was empty, I was running
around in the dark, a Gitanes hanging from my lips, when I
lost my footing and fell down a steep slope, tumbling and
spinning, until I came to a stop in a thicket of bramble bushes.

[p. <i>12</i>]

Robert had to walk me home. My mother exploded
when she saw how drunk I was. She saw me up to bed and
then drove Robert to his house. He said she grilled him all
the way, asking questions like, Why on earth does Nick
have to get that drunk?


The next morning, I had to go to the school nurse and
have dozens of thorns tweezered out of my arms and legs.


Robert and I started to jam at the weekends with Paul
(who played bass) and a friend of his called Dennis (whom
Robert and I vaguely knew from school) on drums. We
got along well and it took no more than a few rehearsals
for us to consider ourselves not only a band but friends
too. We made our live debut at a party thrown by someone
who knew someone whose parents were away. We
arrived at this house in the afternoon and got drunk as
soon as we had set up our equipment. By the time the
house was filled with a hundred plus fifteen-year-olds, we
were too drunk to even tune our instruments, let alone
play them. After thirty minutes of trying and failing to
play ‘Louie, Louie’, someone cut the power. Our amps
coughed and packed up. We tossed our instruments down
in disgust. It was Dennis's idea that we go upstairs. Why?
Robert asked. So we can trash the place, deadpanned
Dennis. He led us into a bedroom and opened all the
windows. Then he locked the door and began to pull out
drawers — filled with socks, underwear, letters, cassettes —
and empty them out the windows. We joined in. After an
hour, the trees and bushes and flowers below were strewn

[p. <i>13</i>]

Ben's parents were in Poland for a fortnight so he invited
me over to his house to split a litre of high-strength Polish
vodka.


‘I want you home by eleven,’ my father said as I tied my
shoe laces. ‘It's a school night.’


‘I will be,’ I said. ‘Don't worry about it.’


Ben and I walked to the local off-licence to buy a mixer.
I chose a bottle of sparkling wine.


‘Are you serious?’ Ben said. ‘It'll be a lethal combination.’


‘That's the point you idiot,’ I said and took it to the
counter.


When we had drunk the litre of vodka and all of the
sparkling wine, I got up to change the TV channel and
passed out stone-cold on the carpet. Apparently, Ben spent
several minutes trying to revive me before he passed out
too. When we both came round, we crawled to the toilet
and lay side by side, taking turns to throw up. When I
managed to stay upright long enough to consider walking
home, I staggered off down the street, ricocheting off
hedgerows and street signs. I saw a figure in the darkness
coming towards me. It was my father. It was after 1.30
am. He said that he and my mother couldn't sleep, that
they were worried sick about me. Why was I so drunk?
What the hell did I think I was playing at?

[p. <i>14</i>]

The band was a novelty that soon wore off. When we
stopped rehearsing, nobody cared except Paul. His insistence
that we keep playing was to the rest of us nothing
but another symptom of how badly he was dealing with
his parents' separation. We tried to get him to talk about it
but he refused. And the less he talked about it, the more
agitated he got about everything else. He started to smoke
a lot of pot before, during and after school, and took to
watching the kinds of sci-fi movies that only make sense if
you're stoned. He went off the rails — as far as we were
concerned — when he fell in love with Suzy, a girl who
spent all her time at the community Baptist church. A few
dates with her and Paul was a committed Baptist. His
overnight embracing of religion got up our noses, including
Ben's, who was offended that Paul had chosen the
Baptist faith over Catholicism. We made fun of Paul,
offering to baptise him with our pints of beer. It took
him several minutes to get the joke, because even though
he was now a Baptist, he was also a very stoned Baptist.


One day, Paul's tutor at school burst into my History
class and asked if he could speak to me in private. I went
outside with him. ‘Paul's gone missing,’ he said. ‘His
mother thinks you might know where he is.’ I didn't. A
week later the police brought him home. It transpired that
he had cleaned out his savings account and fled to Birmingham
with Suzy. When they were back, Suzy broke up
with him and then it was over, his little fantasy where they
went on the run like lovers in a Nicholas Ray movie.

[p. <i>15</i>]

In October 1987 I met Katherine at a party. When I first saw
her she was dancing to ‘Love Will Tear Us Apart’by Joy
Division. I had no nose for omens in those days so I crossed
the room and decided to fall in love with her. She had
Marilyn Monroe hips and a nervous, shrill laugh. We
started going out, mostly to pubs after our first date — a
stolen afternoon at a coffee shop during school hours — had
turned into a disaster. Sober, I came across as a rambling
Woody Allen, a mumbling Marlon Brando, knocked a cup
of coffee all over the table and made a fool of myself.


Three weeks into our ‘relationship’ — and to be honest, it
would be more accurate to say that we happened to be in
the same room from time to time — I offered to drive to a
big party that someone from school was having the
following weekend at a nearby night club. ‘Oh don't
drive,’ she said. ‘You're such fun when you're drunk.’


So I didn't drive to the party... instead I drank before I
went out and I drank on the way to the club and when I
got there, already on my way to being drunk, I found
Katherine at the first-floor bar wearing a yellow dress with
a faded denim jacket draped across her shoulders. Her
lipstick was blood-red, her neck pale as Russia. No matter
what I said she didn't seem to give a damn. Things that
usually made her laugh didn't, things that she liked to talk
about failed to raise a spark of interest either. We were icy
strangers, her cheekbones blue with indifference.


The music was deafening. On the matt-black dance
floor, strobe lights licked the lips of young lovers. She
dragged me by the sleeve of my jacket to an upstairs
corridor, bare brick walls chaperoning us, a scuffed cigarette

[p. <i>16</i>]

I went to the second floor, spilled into a crowd of strangers,
pushed to the bar. Held hostage by a flurry of adolescent
hormones, I was about to act as though I'd been brutally
abandoned by the love of my life, rather than dumped by
someone who was more ‘girl’ and ‘friend’ than girlfriend. My
reaction — and the makers of <i>Dawson's Creek</i> couldn't have
scripted it any better — had nothing whatsoever to do with her.


I ordered a double Scotch. I downed it in one go and ordered
another before the change from the first drink had even
stopped rattling on the counter. I downed that and ordered
a third. When I downed that too, the bartender refused to
serve me again. I headed for the first floor. My thoughts were
ice cubes playing a cello. The Scotch was screaming in my
veins. I pushed through webs of restless elbows until I saw
Katherine: her mouth breaking into a smile, her shoulders
rising and falling as she laughed, a cigarette dangling from her
fingers. For a second I stepped out of the moment and was
someone else, examining the scene I had just stumbled into.
She looked so happy. What a smile...


I locked myself in a toilet cubicle. I took off my belt and
wrapped it around my neck. I pulled the belt as tight as it
would go. There was a wonderful hush. It was quite nice for
a few seconds, like a daydream or having your photograph
taken, but then consciousness started to drift away. I
considered my options but common sense took hold of
the situation and had me release my grip. The belt fell to the
floor. The buckle rattled when it hit the tiles. The strip lights
were too bright. I returned to life, my chest heaving, my

[p. <i>17</i>]

We got to the cinema early and, after buying tickets, sat on
some steps. My mouth watered when I thought of a gin
and tonic trickling over a nest of ice cubes. I was sure that
she was wondering where the other ‘me’ was, the one that
had kissed her at a party the previous Saturday and asked
her out on this date.


‘What's the matter?’ she said after another few minutes
of awkward silence.


‘My last girlfriend — the one I was telling you about —
thought I was only fun when I was drunk.’


People buzzed around us, hurrying to other films showing
at the multiplex.


‘Don't be silly,’ she said, putting two and two together.
‘I like you just as you are.’


Her voice was soft and reassuring, her long brown hair
a place to fall asleep in and never wake up.


‘Really?’


A smile lit up her face. I told her that I'd driven because I
didn't want to pretend to be something I wasn't. She put
her hand on my leg.


‘It's OK,’ she said. ‘Really. Don't worry.’


She leaned over and gave me a kiss on the cheek.


‘Come on,’ she said. ‘The film's about to begin.’


On the way back from the cinema, I could hear the
stiffness in my voice as I said one stupid thing after another

[p. <i>18</i>]

‘Why?’ she asked, as I pulled into my parents' driveway.


‘Oh you mean after what I said earlier?’


I turned the engine off, knowing that I was minutes
away from a drink curing me of all awkwardness.


‘I don't want you to think that you have to have a drink
to impress me.’


‘I don't,’ I lied. ‘It would just be fun. That's all.’


Elizabeth and I were together for the next two years. It was
perhaps her shyness that made her beautiful to me. She
was such a gentle person. Idealistic too. She believed she
could change the world. Aside from being a vegetarian,
she belonged to Greenpeace, anti-apartheid groups, animal
rights groups, CND, Amnesty International. She was
precociously well read and ranked Camus and J.D. Salinger
as her favourite writers. She always wore vintage
dresses and Doctor Marten boots. Smoked Marlboro
Lights. Drank Scotch. She modelled herself on Andy
Warhol superstar Edie Sedgwick, using Jean Stein's biography
— which she stole from the library — as her guide to
life. A year into our relationship, she cut her hair short like
Edie and took to wearing thick, black rings of kohl around
her eyes. The other copycat accessories, such as amphetamines
and eating disorders, were to come much later.

[p. <i>19</i>]

Our relationship was obsessive and intense from the
start. We quickly came to hate being apart for any amount
of time, seeing school and our Saturday jobs — she worked in
a chemist's, I worked in the local library — as enemies to our
intimacy. When homework kept us home working, we'd
speak on the phone until our parents yelled at us to get off
the line. The rest of the time, we went out whenever we
could, bingeing on each other's company, revelling in our
exile, happy with the solitude of a kiss. There was a downside
to this love, though, too much passion sometimes
tipping us out of balance. On nights when she wouldn't
say a word and sat crying in the car as we drove around
poorly lit streets and lanes, I wondered if she was my Esther
Greenwood, my blue-lipped girl, my embalmed twin.


Nights at the pub, with friends, with Elizabeth, were trips
to a parallel universe. When I walked through the doors of
a pub, I walked back into time before life, into the womb.
When I rested my elbows on the bar, I was home, everything
that was wrong in my life left out in the cold, pawing
at the doors. When I had that first drink inside me, I was
immune to everything. There was nothing, nothing in the
whole wide world, that could touch me.


We were making the long walk home after a night's
drinking with friends at a far-flung pub. There was a

[p. <i>20</i>]

‘I wish you'd stop drinking so much.’


There it was. Right on cue.


‘Oh Jesus. Just drop it.’


The space between us was heavy, swollen. How do you
tell someone who loves you that there's this thing that
makes you feel better than they ever could?


‘It's scaring me,’ she said and she meant it, her eyes were
full of fear. ‘I don't like it when you get drunk and make
everyone laugh and they think you're fun to be with. And
the minute we leave the pub, your mood changes and
you're miserable again.’


I went to put my arm around her — perhaps hoping to
shut her up — but she pushed me away.


‘And another thing,’ she added. ‘I'm sick of all our dates
revolving around drinking.’


I paused to light a cigarette. For a second she sailed
ahead of me. I thought of letting her go. She stopped and
turned around to face me.


‘It's not that bad,’ I said.


‘It is from where I'm standing.’


‘And what if it makes me feel good?’


‘That's crap and you know it.’


‘No it's not. It turns me into someone else. Someone I
like.’

[p. <i>21</i>]

‘Why can't you just be yourself?’


Her question rang out over all the houses that were in
darkness, the trees that were still, the clouds overhead that
were passing in slow motion.


School was over. The A-level exam results were out. I got
better grades than anyone expected. I blew off my offer of
a place to study American Literature at the University of
East Anglia because I didn't want to be away from
Elizabeth. Instead, I decided to take a gap year and reapply
to study English at the University of London. In the
meantime, as I'd done all summer long, I worked four
days a week at the library. One Saturday, there was a book
sale. I turned up with a massive hangover and was asked
to make sure that every book on the sale trolley was priced
before the doors opened to the public. I sipped a mug of
black coffee while I sifted through the books. One of them
— <i>Alcoholism and the Facts</i> — caught my eye and I pulled it
from the stack. There was a questionnaire on the back
cover headed ‘Are You An Alcoholic?’. I hurried through
each question, answering yes or no.


1 Do you lose time from work due to drinking?


<i>No</i>.


2 Is drinking making your home life unhappy?


<i>No</i>.


3 Do you drink because you are shy with other
people?


<i>Yes</i>.

[p. <i>22</i>]

4 Is drinking affecting your reputation?


<i>Yes</i>.


5 Have you ever felt remorse after drinking?


<i>Yes</i>.


6 Have you ever gotten into financial difficulties as a
result of drinking?


<i>No</i>.


7 Do you turn to lower companions and an inferior
environment when drinking?


<i>No</i>.


8 Does your drinking make you careless of your
family's welfare?


<i>No</i>.


9 Has your ambition decreased since drinking?


<i>Yes</i>.


10 Do you crave a drink at a definite time daily?


<i>Yes</i>.


11 Do you want a drink the next morning?


<i>No</i>.


12 Does drinking cause you to have difficulty sleeping?


<i>Yes</i>.


13 Has your efficiency decreased since drinking?


<i>Yes</i>.


14 Is drinking jeopardising your job or business?


<i>No</i>.


15 Do you drink to escape from worries or trouble?


<i>Yes</i>.


16 Do you drink alone?


<i>No</i>.


17 Have you ever had a complete loss of memory as a
result of drinking?


<i>No</i>.

[p. <i>23</i>]

18 Has your physician ever treated you for drinking?


<i>No</i>.


19 Do you drink to build up your self-confidence?


<i>Yes</i>.


20 Have you ever been to a hospital or institution on
account of drinking?


<i>No</i>.


I answered <i>Yes</i> to nine of the twenty questions. I was
relieved and about to put the book back on the sale trolley
when I saw the foot-note at the end of the questionnaire: ‘If
you have answered YES to any one of the questions, there is a
definite warning that you may be alcoholic. If you have
answered YES to any two, the chances are that you are an
alcoholic. If you have answered YES to three or more, you
are definitely an alcoholic’ I stuffed the book back on the
trolley and went back to checking the rest of the books.
When my break came, I went over to the trolley and hid the
book in the geography section. Whenever there was a sale,
members of staff were allowed to take home any books that
were left at the end of the day. When the doors were closed
to the public, I slipped the book inside my jacket and took it
home. I stuffed it in a drawer and never read a page. Until
years later of course, when I needed to.


‘This is creepy,’ said Elizabeth. ‘I don't think we're going
to find it.’


We stood with our hands on our hips, wondering if we
wanted to carry on checking the graves. There were so

[p. <i>24</i>]

‘Find her,’ I corrected. ‘I don't think we're going to find
her.’


The day before, Elizabeth and I had driven to Leeds to
see Bruce Springsteen. We stayed the night with her
grandmother and then took a detour the following afternoon
to find Sylvia Plath's grave.


‘Should we just go?’ she said.


A lot of the graves were laid on a steep slope which was
difficult to walk down.


‘Let's look one last time. Down there.’


‘Do we have to?’


‘Yes.’


‘What's the point?’


I was already edging my way down. I could hear her
groaning but I kept on, checking one name after another.
Elizabeth clambered down and stood beside me.


‘Please tell me why we're doing this,’ she said. ‘I need to
know.’


I knew her well enough to know she was going to cry.


‘We're doing this so that she lives on.’


‘But her books do that.’


‘I want more than just the books,’ I said. ‘I want to tell
her what <i>The Bell Jar</i> means to me.’


She held out her hand, palm up. I felt it too. Drops of
rain.


‘I think she already knows.’


I moved backwards, so I could see one last grave. It
wasn't hers. The epitaph read: <i>Even In The Midst Of Life,
We Are In Death</i>.


‘Look at this,’ I said. ‘It's beautiful’

[p. <i>25</i>]

She climbed down.


When we got back to the car, we were soaked.


I got a job working in an off-licence. A lot of drinking
went on in there. It was the manager's doing. He didn't
care about anything. He slipped bottles of Moët et Chandon
and Lanson Black Label into his bag at the end of each
day. He used to encourage us to drink during the day,
saying things like, Put this new Japanese beer in the
refrigerator. I want you all to sample it this afternoon.
Twice a week, we all had to work a 9am to 9pm shift. I
was always put on with Mark, the biggest drinker on staff.
We'd open the doors at 9am and at 9.15 he'd chuck a can
of beer over to me and we'd start drinking. This went on
all day — we had to match each other drink for drink — and
by mid-afternoon we'd be ripped out of our minds. One
night, when he was too drunk to serve a customer, he
abandoned the counter and locked himself in the stock
room. He sent me out to serve her while his hysterical
laughter rang out around the shop. She asked me what
was wrong with him. I told her he was working too hard.
Oh, she said and handed me her credit card.


My parents bought a new house three miles away from
our old one which meant that I could no longer walk over
to see Elizabeth. At the same time, all of my friends

[p. <i>26</i>]

In November 1988, I went for an interview at Goldsmiths'
College, University of London. The Head of the English
department asked me, ‘What do you think of Shakespeare?’


With all the snottiness of youth, I said, ‘I'd take a Bob
Dylan album over the complete works of Shakespeare any
day.’


He offered me a place there and then, before we had
even talked about the course, my background, writers,
writing. I went home and celebrated by getting drunk.


‘Where did you get that from?’


He smirked. His hands were full of five-pound notes,

[p. <i>27</i>]

‘Nurses.’


I stared again at the money and then back at his face.


‘What do you mean?’


We were on our break, sitting in the hospital staff room,
waiting for the intercom to call us to take a patient
somewhere or to go into an operating theatre and turn
a patient over.


‘How do you think they make it through their night
shifts?’


I thought about it. Some of the nurses always looked
terrible — pale with charcoal-grey half-moons beneath
bloodshot eyes.


‘What are you saying?’


He had five earrings in his left ear. His head was shaved.
His tattoos contracted every time he rubbed the stubble on
his skull.


‘Speed,’ he whispered. ‘I supply the nurses.’


‘You're dealing speed in here?’


He laughed. My naiveté embarrassed me.


‘Do you want some?’


I shook my head.


‘Goody two shoes,’ he said.


The intercom summoned us to one of the operating
theatres. When we got there, there was blood everywhere,
on the walls, on the floor, on the gurney. I couldn't stand
the sight of blood.


Two weeks later, I quit that job too.

[p. <i>28</i>]

‘I don't want that,’ she said.


Elizabeth and I were sitting in her bedroom. Morrissey
was whining about something on her tinny stereo. She was
sick with glandular fever. My short career as a temp was
already history. I was now working at a local health foods
store.


‘Want what?’


I was still going over to see her almost every night. She'd
fix me a brandy as soon as I walked through the front
door.


‘You kissing me.’


‘What's that supposed to mean?’


We had been arguing ever since I left school. It seemed
as though my gap year was wrecking everything. That and
the glandular fever.


‘You know.’


She stared at my left foot. I looked down. I was crushing
her dog-eared copy of J.D. Salinger's <i>Franny And Zooey</i>. I
pushed it out the way.


‘What? You don't find me attractive any more?’


‘I don't know.’


I looked down at my drink for support. It was empty.
She looked at me, doe eyes, apologetic smile, hands
clasped, barefoot, snow-white legs, the hem of her skirt
riding high.


‘What do you mean you don't know?’


‘I just don't know if I feel that way about you any more.’


Her mother was shouting about something downstairs.
Morrissey had nothing more to say. The tape had ended.
Silence took over the room like a bad smell.

[p. <i>29</i>]

Something wasn't right because my eyes wouldn't open —
something was making them stick together. My head was
so thick with the vodka from the night before that it took
me a while to figure out what was happening. After
arguing with Elizabeth, I stopped off on the way home
for a bottle of vodka and a cheap mixer. Everyone was
asleep when I got in so I drank the vodka slumped in front
of the TV. I remember the screen getting blurry and then —
the next thing I knew — my mother put a cup of tea beside
my bed and drew the curtains. My eyelids — like windscreen
wipers struggling to clear cold, sticky porridge from
my eyeballs — opened. The duvet cover was damp and
cold. My mother came back into my bedroom with a
puzzled look on her face. What's that smell? I sat up fast
and the stench choked me. There was vomit over bed
covers, up the bedroom wall, over the carpet, in my hair,
over my face and chest and arms. What have you done!
she screamed. I had thrown up in my sleep...


Forty-five minutes later I was behind the counter at the
health foods store, trying to answer customers' questions
about vitamins and supplements. I lasted no more than
fifteen minutes before having to rush to the staff toilet to
puke again. The owner of the store sent me home. I told
him it was a bug. The next day, man to boy in the
warehouse, he asked me if I was feeling better. I said I
was. He gave me a knowing smile and handed me a bag of
oats saying, I guess you had a bit too much to drink didn't
you? I didn't say anything and carried the bag of oats over
to the store, the coarse fabric of the sack rubbing against
my sweating hands.

[p. <i>30</i>]

‘We shouldn't see each other for a while.’


It took a mere ten syllables for Elizabeth to put a bullet
through the head of fourteen months of love.


‘Can I call you?’ I pleaded.


She shook her head. No matter how often she wiped her
face, there were more tears.


‘This sounds like the end. Is it the end for us?’


She shook her head again. I stood up. I put my jacket
on.


‘I love you,’ I said and left her sitting on her bed.


Late at night, when I was alone and drunk, thoughts
flickered in my rotting brain: driving off a cliff, hanging
myself from a tree, running a hot bath and slashing my
wrists, jumping off a tall building, sitting in the garage
with my car running, cutting my throat with a carving
knife. Everywhere I went, I saw new ways, new possibilities.
Lamp-posts. Motorway bridges. Building sites. Plastic
containers marked ‘poison’. This was all I looked for. I
had a black smile, ugly pinpricks spun beneath the shade
of my eyelids. I was dreaming of peace of mind or, better
still, a mouth filled with moist soil. I spoke through my
ears, listened through my nostrils, breathed through my
hair. There was nonsense in the air and my hands were
utterly, completely empty.

[p. <i>31</i>]

One Monday morning, I woke up and didn't want to get out
of bed. All I wanted was to go back to sleep. I liked it there in
the land of sleep. Pillow, bed, duvet. It was so simple. Midmorning,
I was sent across the road from the health foods
store to make up snack bags of nuts and grains. The
warehouse was cold and cramped and there were no
windows. I was cutting pieces of tape with a Stanley knife.
It was store policy to seal the bags with one piece of
vertically applied tape. I stopped what I was doing. I picked
up the knife and stroked the tip of the blade across the top of
my thumb. <i>What a thrill. My thumb instead of an onion.
The top quite gone. Except for a sort of a hinge. Of skin. A
flap like a hat. Dead white. Then that red plush</i>. The blade
left a white line. All the air was sucked out of that warehouse.
The blade was holding its breath. We were both
afraid. I rolled my shirt sleeve up. My veins were hiding. I
saw pools of blood and flashing blue lights as I held the
blade, in my shaking hand, just millimetres above those
shivering veins. I was ready to step out of this life when the
warehouse door swung open and daylight shocked me.


‘OK, Nick? How are the bags coming along?’


It was the owner. He was in his late fifties, always
positive, always keen. I put the knife down.


‘Fine,’ I said. ‘Everything's just fine.’


When the humming eventually blurred into a drone, there
was a lot of white. And static. Transmitting stopped. I was

[p. <i>32</i>]

The doctor was understanding. There had been such shame
while I sat in the waiting room. I thought that everyone was
staring at me, my face a banner with the phrase ‘mental
illness’ scrawled across it in a child's handwriting. I sat
opposite him in a black plastic chair. Tried to make words
form sentences, struggled with a vocabulary that was then
unfamiliar. He listened to me and then I listened to him and
then we listened to each other. He had a lot of questions. I
thought he was smart, really smart, to ask questions that
were also somehow the answers. Are you sleeping too much
or not at all? Do you wake early each morning or do you
have trouble getting off to sleep at night? Have you lost your
appetite or are you unusually hungry ? Have you lost weight
or gained weight? Have you lost interest in your hobbies? Is
anything difficult happening in your life? I put my thoughts
in his scales each time and weighed my response before
answering, measuring out just the right amount of truth.


‘I think it's clear,’ he said, leaning forward in his chair.
‘That you are suffering from severe depression.’


‘It’ had a name.


We had just finished talking about Elizabeth, my gap

[p. <i>33</i>]

I left the medical centre on legs of lead and carried my
faulty brain out to the car park where a grey sun wished
me dead.


That night, I went over to see Elizabeth. She only agreed to
see me after I told her I had something really important to
tell her. When she opened the front door, our old routine
took charge of a tense situation. I followed her into the
kitchen. She grabbed the bottle of Rémy Martin on the
counter and was reaching for a tumbler when I told her I
didn't want any brandy. Oh, she said, surprised. Do you
want a beer instead? No. Maybe a glass of water. The taps
were always too powerful. She got sprayed. We would
have laughed at this a few months earlier. Now, she just
swore under her breath and we sat down at the kitchen

[p. <i>34</i>]

‘For god's sake,’ she hissed. ‘Stop crying. My mum's
next door! I don't want her to see you like this.’


She shoved me hard. I let go of her.


‘I saw the doctor today. He said I'm depressed. He's put
me on antidepressants.’


‘What?’


She sat down at the kitchen table. I wiped my eyes with
my shirt sleeve. We didn't say anything for a long time.
Her mother passed through the room without saying a
word. I left soon after, waving to Elizabeth from my car as
she stood, awkward and stunned, at the front door.


The next time I went over to see her, her mother answered
the door and told me that Elizabeth was still in the bath.
She took me into the lounge and we sat in front of the fire.


‘Elizabeth told me what's going on,’ she said.


‘Oh right,’ I said, embarrassed, thinking she was going
to tell me to give up on her daughter, that she didn't love
me any more.


‘And I want you to know that if you ever need someone
to talk to then you can count on me.’


I was surprised.


‘That's very kind, thank you,’ I said.


The flames cackled from across the room.

[p. <i>35</i>]

The pills were no miracle cure at first. The sedative effect
wiped me out. I was drugged all day and then, just as the
medication lessened its grip on me, it was time to take
another pill. Then there was the furball mouth in the
mornings, the constipation, the headaches, the dizziness. I
went back to see my doctor after a fortnight and told him
that things weren't any better. He asked me to be patient.
‘I am being patient,’ I said. And I was. I hadn't touched a
drop of alcohol since first seeing him. It was easy then.
Irritating more than anything else and, besides, I was
willing to go without if it would help me get better. I
dealt with the edginess of being sober by running most
nights after work. I'd run until I couldn't run any more
and then I'd pause somewhere out in that winter chill, bent
double in the middle of nowhere and try to catch my
breath. Meanwhile my parents did their best to try and
pick me up. If I watched a film, my father stayed up and
watched it with me. If I was alone in my bedroom at night,
my mother would try to persuade me to come downstairs
and watch TV. Even after three weeks, nothing seemed to
be changing so my parents came up with a plan. My father
was going to Boston and New York on business. They
asked me if I wanted to go with him.


‘The change of scenery will do you good,’ they said. ‘It's
only for five days but you'd get to see New York.’


It was my dream to visit New York. So he took me with
him. We spent nights together, going out to dinner, him
trying to make sense of what was wrong with me. And
then he made another dream come true by paying for us to
spend the last night of the trip at the Chelsea Hotel. We

[p. <i>36</i>]

Seven weeks after going on the medication, I woke up one
morning and threw the bed covers back. I jumped out of
bed, something I hadn't done in a long, long time. Everything
was suddenly back to normal. It was like seeing an
old friend after many years of being apart. I wanted to hug
myself and say, Where have you been? I've been looking
everywhere for you. It was then, only then, that I realised
how sick I'd been. I opened the curtains ...


No more humming. No more drone. I believed — or
wanted to believe — that the medication had cured me. I
had no reason not to. It was June 1989. Warm weather,
blue skies. I had been to see my doctor. He took me off the
antidepressants. I'd left my job at the health food store and
was now working at another off-licence. I was off my
chemical leash, free to roam wherever I pleased. I started
drinking again as soon as the antidepressants were out of
my blood. I couldn't wait. Wet throat, thirsty fangs. First
moments of drunkenness warm and familiar. Glass fingers

[p. <i>37</i>]

Elizabeth was calling again. The frequency of her calls
picked up after the medication kicked in. She wanted me
again, probably because ‘me’ had come back from a black
holiday. I was new and improved. A white-toothed smile
of an advertisement for antidepressants.


Everything was great and then my brief splash of optimism
and happiness soured overnight. Getting better was
a tightrope walk. It was fine until I lost my balance. I was
dizzy with love as Elizabeth and I rolled in the sheets of
our second honeymoon. I was back to drinking all the
time. My smile slipped off my face when I wasn't looking.
Sometimes there were flashes of truth and I would realise
that the more I drank, the more the depression ballooned.
For such a short while, I was allowed to believe that the
pills had cured me forever. Now I knew, I really knew, that
there was something wrong with me, something that no
medicine could rectify. And so, when the depression
tackled me again, I threw my hands up in the air and
was slapped to the ground. The gravel was glad to see me
and my split cheeks cremated into a grin.

[p. <i>38</i>]

The heat was oppressive. Mosquitoes buzzed about my
face. I was taking a short cut through a thicket of bushes
and trees to meet Paul and the others on time. I was drunk
on a steady stream of Budweiser. I had another one on the
go as I walked. I also had a razor blade in my jacket
pocket. Earlier, in the bathroom at home, I had pulled it
from its disposable plastic yellow shell and wrapped it in a
wad of tissue. I had been obsessed for days with a passage
in <i>The Bell Jar</i> where Esther Greenwood stands on a beach
and says, ‘I fingered the box of razors in my pocket book.’
I too was dreaming of drowning myself in a loveless ocean
or taking an overdose of pills or slashing my wrists.


We met outside the only local off-licence I hadn't
worked at. There was a big discussion about what we
were going to do — go to a pub, or a hotel bar, or the fair
that had blown into town for the weekend. As the debate
raged on, I unravelled the razor blade from the tissue. I
crumpled the now-empty Budweiser can with my other
hand. The blade came loose from the tissue. ‘<i>I fingered the
box of razors in my pocket book</i>.’ How sharp it was! I
could hear everyone voting on whether or not to buy
drinks from the off-licence and then head to the fair. No
one was watching me. I lifted the blade from my pocket. I
pressed it against the flesh of my left wrist. It was slippery
in my sweaty fingers. I could hardly breathe. I pressed
down and dragged the blade.


I looked down at my wrist. A red line appeared. I
dragged the blade across my skin again, a little further
this time. A second line appeared. Then, a third time. It
was magical. The world shrank. It was like swimming

[p. <i>39</i>]

‘Are you OK?’


Paul's voice pulled me from the water. He was calling
from the other side of the street. The others were busy
filing into the off-licence.


‘Of course,’ I said, tugging my jacket sleeve over my wrist.


‘Hurry up then.’


I dropped the razor blade into my pocket. Paul held the
door open for me. Inside, everyone was busy choosing
their drinks.


‘Beer?’ he said, holding up a fourpack of Grolsch.


I shook my head. I couldn't keep it a secret. I pulled my
sleeve back and showed him what I couldn't seem to say.


‘What the fuck have you done?’ he said.


Two or three others came over. It was too late to give a
shit. He pointed at my arm.


‘Who has a tissue?’ he said, his voice breathy with panic.


‘I do,’ I said.


I pulled the tissue out of my pocket and handed it to
him. He snatched it and pressed it against the cuts.


‘I have to get him back to my place,’ he said.


They nodded. The others were laughing at the counter,
oblivious, paying for their drinks.


‘I didn't know it had got this bad again,’ he said, as we
sat at his kitchen table twenty minutes later, me sobbing
uncontrollably, him digging through a dusty first-aid kit.


Nobody did.

[p. <i>40</i>]

Cutting myself became just another symptom, another
language. It was like lancing a blister. That's how I knew
when to stop: when the pain in my head was gone, when
the skin had burst like an umbrella and shielded me from
the downpour. I'd wake up from a grey sleep and realise
what I was doing to myself. I'd wear long sleeves for days
afterwards — even if it was a hot sunny day — and squirm if
my parents or sister asked me why. Is it warm? I'd say,
beads of sweat crawling down my sides. When Elizabeth
and I made love, I kept my shirt on or turned the lights out.
I flinched when she grabbed my wrists, her tight grip
oblivious to the pain she was causing me. She would
squeeze tighter and tighter until we were done and I
would lie in the dark and want to scream.


Curls of smoke swirled off the barbecue, yawned for a
moment and then flew off into the night. Paul was
throwing a spontaneous party. A dozen of us were
slumped on the back lawn, smoking and drinking. I
was talking in hushed tones with Rebecca, a new friend
of Paul's.


‘Drinking is the last thing you need,’ she said. ‘If you're
prone to depression then it's really stupid to drink every
night. Which Paul says you do.’


Her green eyes locked with mine and chastised me.


‘And if you get drunk,’ she continued, ‘then you do
things like slash your wrists when you're out with friends.’

[p. <i>41</i>]

She raised her eyebrows. They were brown. Her hair
was dyed red, a deep, dark red.


‘Oh Paul told you about that.’


Paul was useless at keeping secrets. He had already told
me that Rebecca was manic depressive and taking lithium.
He had given me the whole story — suicide attempts, spells
in hospital, diagnosis, lithium, therapy — after smoking
some mind-blowing pot.


‘Listen,’ she said, as she nibbled on a smile-shaped slice
of raw onion. ‘The only thing that numbs depression is
death. Think about it.’


She ate the rest of the onion. She was so pale. Her skin
had a yellowish hue to it. Paul said this was because of the
lithium.


‘I know,’ I said, feeling sheepish because I had a beer in
my hand.


‘This is my last try,’ she said, tucking a strand of that red
hair behind her ear. ‘If you're prone to depression and you
drink, then you're doubling the depression because alcohol
is a depressant. Follow me? Right. Now think of a bird
taking a plane ride from A to B. Why pay for a set of wings
when you've already got a perfectly good pair?’


My grandfather died at the end of August. My reaction to
his death was muted. I think I was suspended in a state of
disbelief. My grief was packed in ice and dropped far into
my subconscious. When the funeral service ended, the
blood-red curtain to the right of the coffin whirred into
action. It was drawn on runners until it covered the coffin,

[p. <i>42</i>]

Dawn was crawling up on the world. The sun was already
bright. Elizabeth had left her shoes on the beach and was
paddling in the sea. Waves were caressing her ankles. She
was wearing all white. There wasn't a cloud in the sky. We
were in Corfu. Our holiday was almost over. A hangover
was rising in my skull. My eyes angry slits. I couldn't think
of anything to say. We were all talked out. Drunk and
exhausted, we had wandered in silence along the beach,
she ten or so paces ahead of me, me following her footsteps
in the sand.


Tower blocks. The sludge of Deptford Creek. Yellow
lights. Barges and cargo boats. A traffic jam all the way
down to Greenwich. A hall of residence: eight-foot-high
walls, barbed wire, facing a cemetery. A short walk to the
spot where Christopher Marlowe got stabbed in the eye.
My room overlooked a concrete courtyard. I arrived with

[p. <i>43</i>]

I took two cans of Miller Lite down to the first hall dinner.
The other students had beakers of fruit juice or glasses of
water or cups of coffee or mugs of tea. When I cracked the
first ring-pull — it was just after six — everyone stared.


If we didn't want to be disturbed in the morning by the
cleaners, we had to put our wastepaper bin outside our door
at bed-time. I turned up to the first few breakfasts hung over
and then stopped going. I started to put my bin outside my
door. Typically, it was full of crumpled beer cans, deflated
cartons of orange juice, empty bottles of vodka and heaps of
cigarette ash, topped off with countless cigarette butts. It
took no more than a fortnight for the gossiping to start. One
morning, I woke up to voices outside my door.


‘Shit,’ said a voice I didn't recognise. ‘Look at his bin.’


‘I know,’ said someone else. ‘It's like that every morning.’


‘Is he an alcoholic?’ I heard another girl say.


‘Looks like it,’ said a male voice. I recognised the voice.
It was the student hall monitor. ‘Every morning, his bin's
overflowing. It's getting scary.’

[p. <i>44</i>]

‘What are you going to do about it?’ said the first girl.


‘Tell Meadows,’ said the hall monitor.


I pulled the covers over my head. Meadows — a frantic,
sweaty man with a passion for Elizabethan literature and
heavy drinking — was the hall director. He was also one of
my course tutors.


Three drunken students taped objects to the ceiling of my
tiny room: books, cassettes, slices of bread, cutlery and
even an open umbrella, tied to the light fitting. One
student abandoned his giant home-made bong long enough
to vanish and return with an opened can of rice
pudding which he poured into the umbrella. I spent most
of the party shotgunning cans of Budweiser while The
Replacements blasted from my stereo. Sometime, deep in
the night, Meadows stormed into the room and shouted at
me. I got a written warning the following morning. I sat
reading it beneath the rice-pudding-filled umbrella. I was
charged with ‘Excessive noise disturbance’. I threw the
letter down into a pool of stale beer.


I often drank a can of beer before going to classes, even the
ones that started at 9.30 am. I remember the fitness freak
student who lived in the room opposite me shaking his
head when he saw me sipping a beer in the corridor at 8.45
one morning.

[p. <i>45</i>]

‘Don't you ever stop?’ he said.


I crumpled the can in my hand.


‘Evidently not.’


‘Where are you going?’


I was pulling my jeans on. It was almost 5am.


‘Back to my room.’


I didn't really know whose room I was in. I knew her
name was Caroline and I knew that she was studying
psychology but that was about it.


‘Guilty about cheating on your girlfriend?’


‘Something like that.’


A student on my floor called Andy had thrown a party.
Caroline and I talked all night, our tongues loosened by
Andy's lethal joints and bottles of budget-priced vinegary
wine. When she was trashed her brown eyes took on a
dirty glaze and smoke rings cuffed our wrists together
until time passed and we were in her bed, our limbs
tangled like threads of wet tobacco. And then, hours later,
when the pot and wine had worn off, we were two
strangers hiding in the dark.


‘I've got a boyfriend. You're not the only one who feels
bad here.’


I was crouched down, lacing my shoes up.


‘I know.’


What had I done? I was confused. I thought of Elizabeth.
And then I looked at the naked woman looking at
me.


‘Go on then,’ she said. ‘Get out of here.’

[p. <i>46</i>]

I went back to my room.


I opened a can of beer, lay on my bed and stared at the
ceiling.


Elizabeth and I talked on the phone most nights but there
was little to say. She was still at school, I was away at
university. She was living with her parents, I was living
alone. Our phone calls crackled with awkward silences.
Were we drifting apart? Was it over? Would I tell her
about this? I was due to meet Elizabeth later that morning
in Kensington. What had I done to her? I got up. I was
unsteady on my feet, drunker than I thought. I grabbed a
disposable razor from under the sink. I shattered the
plastic shell with the heel of a shoe. I pulled the blade
free. I sat back down on the lip of my bed ...


When she took me in her arms at the station, nasty cuts
snarled beneath my shirt sleeves. Just like old times. We
went for coffee. I couldn't tell her. She seemed so kind, so
loving. She made me feel dirty and soiled. When it was
time for her to leave, I flinched when she said she loved me
because only hours before I had been with someone else,
someone who had somehow replaced her, someone I had
wanted like I hadn't wanted Elizabeth in a long time.


I called her the following evening and — with a bottle of
vodka inside me — broke up with her.


‘But why,’ she kept saying, crying.


‘Because we've grown apart,’ I repeated over and over.
‘Because we've grown apart.’

[p. <i>47</i>]

When I went home for Reading Week in November 1989, I
saw the doctor again. I was pasty-faced, gaunt. Couldn't
sleep. So much cutting, drinking, smoking. The doctor
listened again. I gave him the inventory of my recent life:
my grandfather's death, the break-up with Elizabeth, moving
out of home. I edited out the best bits: the bits that I
thought would get me committed. The sad comfort of a
razor blade, the slap of a breakfast beer, the days when I
didn't wake up until late afternoon. He said I had lost ‘an
alarming amount of weight’, and for a second time diagnosed
me as suffering from severe depression and anxiety.


He wrote out a prescription for the same antidepressant
as before, reminding me that the sedative effect would help
control the anxiety. He warned me again that I shouldn't
drink alcohol while taking the medication. This time,
though, I didn't give a fuck. I had no intention of quitting
drinking. That was all I had left. I really believed this. He
asked me to see my university doctor as soon as I went
back because she needed to monitor my progress.


Later that night, I stood in the kitchen, with a little red
pill in the palm of my hand and thought, Here we go
again. The dry mouth, the drowsiness, the check-ups, the
constipation, the foggy brain...the medicated merry-go-round,
the short-term relief ... and then what?


The university doctor was impatient and curt with me.


‘Are you contemplating suicide?’ she asked.

[p. <i>48</i>]

I stared at her. Contemplating? That made it sound so
rational, like do I want toast or cereal for breakfast ...


‘No,’ I said, telling myself that I was in for a sprained
ankle.


She was icy, disinterested.


‘Are you happy with the dose you're on?’


How could I be happy being on antidepressants?


‘It isn't working,’ I said. ‘If that's what you're asking.’


‘Let's raise the dose then.’


She scribbled out a prescription that would make it
almost impossible for me to wake up before one or two in
the afternoon.


During the next fortnight, I dyed my hair orange, then
dark brown and finally black. I got my ear pierced. I
skipped most of my classes. I smoked forty, fifty cigarettes
a day. I cut myself. I drank from the moment I was awake
until the moment I wasn't. Got stoned all the time. Barely
ate anything. I lost so much weight that my clothes hung
off me. I had dark circles under my eyes. I missed Elizabeth.
I missed my parents. I missed my grandfather. I went
back to the doctor and told her the pills still weren't
working. She referred me to a psychiatrist.


The psychiatrist had silver hair and red puffy hamster
cheeks. He greeted my attempts to tell him how desperate I

[p. <i>49</i>]

Kristen was an American student on an exchange programme.
She wore only black and loved The Cure. She
was snow-pale and never drank alcohol. When I asked her
why — as if there was something wrong with her because
she didn't drink — she said she didn't like feeling out of
control. We were introduced by another American student
in my hall and within minutes she was mothering me. The
friendship that ensued was brief and intense. By the time
we were getting to know each other, she was on her way
back to California. But years later, she would play an
enormous part in changing my life. Whenever I saw her,
she took to dragging me back to her hall where she would
feed me pasta. ‘You have to eat,’ she would say as she
chopped tomatoes and garlic. ‘Look at you. You're so
thin.’ She was the only friend at university who seemed to
care when I told her that I was going to start seeing a
psychiatrist. ‘I think this will help,’ she said. ‘You really
need to talk to someone.’ The night after my first appointment

[p. <i>50</i>]

I saw the psychiatrist once a fortnight. Every appointment
was a replay of the first. As I walked from my room to the
medical centre, I rehearsed speeches that I never got to say.
Each meeting was short and procedural. In early December,
at our last appointment before the end of term, I
turned up with cuts on my left wrist. When we sat down,
he began — as always — by asking me how I was doing. I
rolled up my shirt sleeve and said, ‘This is how I'm doing.

[p. <i>51</i>]

On Christmas day, I stood at the lounge window and
looked for my grandfather when the car pulled into the
driveway. My grandmother was in the passenger seat and
her daughter, my aunt, was driving. For a second, a dirty
pane of glass between us, I hoped that it might all have
been a bad dream and that he would be in the back seat,
grey hair swept back, distinguished, wearing his favourite
beige cardigan. I took a sip of champagne. The car doors
swung open. My father went outside to help his mother
out of the car. When we were all pulling crackers, eating
Christmas lunch, his absence sat at the table like it was a
new member of the family.


When I went back to university, I hadn't had a drink for
five days. I'd been to see my doctor at home for a repeat
prescription. When he found out that I was still drinking,
he ordered me to stop immediately because the alcohol
would be counteracting the effects of the antidepressants.
Once term began, I caught up on course work and wrote
overdue papers. Insomnia plagued me. I locked myself in
at night, hiding from the knuckles that rapped on the
door. I wrote poems and short stories, read Raymond

[p. <i>52</i>]

Andy dropped acid. I didn't want to so I bought six cans of
Carlsberg Special Brew and got drunk instead. When I
finished the final can, he was peaking and looked so
happy. I wanted a piece of that happiness. So I took a
tab. He was the drug king in our hall. He was supplying
everyone with pot, speed, mushrooms, acid. We were
listening to The Butthole Surfers in his room. Everything
was great, euphoric, amazing and then all of a sudden, I
wanted to be alone. I went to my room. I remember
locking the door but then everything goes black. The next
thing I knew, Andy was standing over me. I had torn
posters off my wall, trashed heaps of cassettes, thrown
clothes everywhere. I had also cut my left arm. Deep,
dangerous cuts that would leave scars forever. Andy said
he had been pounding on my door for twenty minutes. I
remembered nothing other than waking up and unlocking
the door and him bursting in. And then I saw the wreckage.
And I had no idea how it happened. He went and got
a student from next door — Mike, from my course — and
the two of them cleaned the wounds and pressed Kleenex
on my arm until the bleeding stopped. ‘Thank fuck for
that,’ Andy said as he eased plasters on to my arm. ‘I
couldn't have taken you to hospital in the state you're in.
And besides, I'm tripping my brains out.’

[p. <i>53</i>]

After two more written warnings from Meadows for
throwing loud parties, he slipped a note under my door
asking me to see him. I should throw you out of the hall
for being a nuisance, he said. But I know you've been
having some problems. I told him about the ongoing
depression, the antidepressants, the psychiatrist. He said
he already knew all about this. Everyone in the English
department is worried about the amount you drink, he
said. I think you're an alcoholic, Nick. You need help. He
asked me to come clean about my drinking at my next
appointment with the psychiatrist. I want you to report
back after you've seen him. I'm not letting you off the
hook. I understand, I said, and left his office.


The psychiatrist leafed through his book of medicines. I
had come to hate that book because he was more interested
in it than me. I had just told him the Meadows story
but had been careful not to use the word ‘alcoholic’. He
was as steely as ever. No reaction. No raised eyebrows.
Just the sound of that big, fat book being slapped on his
thighs. He flicked through it, his brow infuriatingly attentive.
I just wanted him to tell me why I was doing what I
was doing.


‘I'm going to prescribe you another type of medication,’
he said. ‘It's called Antabuse. It's a drug to stop patients
from drinking.’


Stop patients from drinking?

[p. <i>54</i>]

‘What is it?’ I asked.


He looked up from his prescription pad.


‘It's a drug which first came into use in the treatment of
alcoholics in the nineteen fifties. Once it's in your system,
it makes you violently sick if you drink while taking it. If
you mix alcohol with it then you'll be physically ill in a
way that you've never experienced. Under no circumstances
can you mix the two. Is that clear?’


‘Yes,’ I said. ‘Very clear.’


No alcohol. I walked home with the Antabuse tablets in
a chemist's bag. I toyed with the idea of throwing the bag
in a bin and pretending to take it. I knew I needed it
though. <i>The treatment of alcoholics</i>. Back in my room, I
smoked a cigarette and stared out the window. Nineteen
and being prescribed Antabuse. I popped the first of the
Antabuse pills on to my tongue and tried to think of a way
of not having to swallow it but there wasn't one. I went
down to dinner. I had never noticed before how bland the
food was and how dirty the trays were.


A week after I went home for Easter break I decided to
flush every last Antabuse tablet down the toilet. I couldn't
stand being sober. After working out from the leaflet in the
packet that it would take five days to clean the drug out of
my bloodstream, I figured that five days was the perfect
amount of time to get all the reading I needed to get done
out the way. That way I'd clean-sweep the exams and
hang on to my place on the course. It was an ingenious
plan, and by the time the exams were over in May, I had

[p. <i>55</i>]

The early-morning traffic was buzzing outside. Laura got
out of bed, rested her elbows on the window sill and
smoked a cigarette. She was studying English and French,
so some of our classes overlapped. Somehow, our brains
pickled with cheap red wine, we had ended up in bed
together. I'd been out drinking with Mike who'd become a
good friend after playing nurse during that disastrous acid
trip. I was avoiding Andy at all costs and instead spending
nights with Mike talking about our mutual fascination
with Marlon Brando and Mickey Rourke. On that particular
night, he and I ran into Laura and her best friend
Chloe by the hall cigarette machine. We ended up going to
Chloe's room. She opened several bottles of red wine, and
when they were empty, Laura and I went off to her
room...


‘Are you feeling guilty?’ I asked, knowing she had a
serious boyfriend.


‘Guilty about what?’


Her body tensed up, her shoulder blades reaching
towards one another like hesitant lovers, poised to kiss
for the first time.


‘Your boyfriend.’


She blew a cool line of smoke out of her mouth.

[p. <i>56</i>]

‘This is a mistake,’ she said.


There was a long silence and then she put her cigarette
out and came back to bed.


‘So you know I'm seeing someone?’


‘The ski instructor. He lives in Austria doesn't he?’


‘How do you know?’


‘Everyone knows everything in this place.’


And they did. Earlier that night, I had pretended that I
needed to go to my room to get another pack of cigarettes.
She insisted on tagging along with me. I turned my back to
her and took my antidepressants. I was sure that if she
knew I was on medication, she would run a mile. Months
later, when I asked her why she hadn't wanted to know
what the pills were, she laughed and said that everyone in
the hall knew that I was on them.


My initial impression of Laura — based on hall gossip,
casual encounters, sharing those occasional classes — was
that she was the kind of girl who'd not only let you
destroy yourself but would probably come along for the
ride. Everyone said she was a big pot-head. She always
looked stoned, floating around in her black leather jacket
and hippie beads. She had mischievous eyes. A slight
sneer. A sarcastic sense of humour. She had a jaded air
about her too that suggested a dulled nostalgia for better
days.


Once we were spending time together — and there was
no reference to any kind of ‘relationship’ — she turned out
to be shy and introverted. She'd grown up in a rural part

[p. <i>57</i>]

We spent the last few weeks of term staying up all night,
drinking, laughing, fooling around in bed. We had a lot of
fun. Sometimes we woke up in the middle of the afternoon,
nursing gigantic hangovers and she'd chuckle as I
fixed us Alka Seltzer in dirty glasses that we had used the
night before to shoot tequila. We would smoke a few
cigarettes, drink some foul tasting instant coffee and then
make love, the previous night's alcohol oozing from our
pores as we clung to one another like sinking ships, her
sweaty little moans like flares going off against the
stunned silence of my retreating depression. Everything
was fine, more than fine, as long as we didn't mention her
‘other boyfriend’.


Laura and this phantom boyfriend had been together
since they were sixteen. She said he was her ‘first love’. But
when I asked too many questions — like why is her first
love in Austria and not with her — she'd get testy and
change the subject. She hated anyone getting too close to
her. Inside, she was a vacuum, a black hole, and her
biggest fear was that one day someone would find out.
She used sarcasm as a shield and she had a sharp, mean
tongue on her. She hid behind her cleverness and used it to
manipulate everyone around her. I was always trying to

[p. <i>58</i>]

Summer rolled before me, as endless as the fields that
framed Laura's parents' house. I went to stay there as
often as I could. We were both busy with holiday jobs.
She worked as a waitress and I temped, loading trucks
and working in warehouses. July and August flew by as
we spent weekends getting drunk on Portuguese rosé. In
the early hours of the morning — when her parents were
fast asleep next door — we would roll drunkenly around
on her bedroom floor, trying to have the quietest sex
possible. When I was back at my parents' house, I missed
her all the time. We rang each other every night, sharing
the details of our mundane lives. Afterwards, I spent
empty nights getting drunk at local pubs with the old
gang.


On the surface, it seemed that she wasn't really interested
in helping me to get better but then, little things happened
that surprised me. One night, in the middle of dinner with
her parents, her mother handed me a folded piece of note
paper.


‘What's this?’ I asked, taking it from her.


‘It's a number for Depression Fellowship.’


I didn't know she knew. I cringed and turned bright red

[p. <i>59</i>]

‘I read about it in a paper,’ she explained. ‘You can call
them and they'll help you, any time, day or night.’


‘Thank you,’ I said.


When I asked Laura, after dinner, if she and her mother
had been talking about me, she shrugged and said that,
yes, she was worried about me, and yes, her mother
wanted to help me. But I never called the fellowship. I
was too scared that they'd lock me up, too frightened of
what might happen if I told the truth.


One weekend, when her parents were away, Laura bought
some speed from a Hell's Angel. She cut two white lines on
the kitchen table. The high was bright and electric, pricked
with tiny epiphanies where just for a moment, a precious
moment, the world was revolving around us rather than
us around it. The remarkable zest of our trajectory blinded
time. We were pathetic children, pretty paper planes in
tropical rain. We stayed up all night, playing records,
drinking warm beer, laughing, eventually rushing upstairs
to bed. After we made love, my mood crashed and folded
against cruel tarmac, flames calmly taking flesh from bone
with the finesse of a loving butcher. I told her all about my
grandfather's funeral in minute detail. She said very little,
lying beside me, listening. When I finished the story, the
room was quiet. She was asleep. I had been talking to
myself. I wondered if I heard what I was trying to say.

[p. <i>60</i>]

Laura came out of the shower. Her hair was soaking wet,
she wrapped a towel around herself.


‘Are you serious?’


I had just told her that I wanted to throw my antidepressants
down the toilet.


‘Yes,’ I said. ‘I want to do it. I'm sick of these things. It's
no life to keep popping pills.’


She frowned.


‘Shouldn't you see a doctor first?’


I wanted to tell her how much I loved her, that it was her
who had made me feel alive again, but I couldn't. She
refused to clarify if she had broken things off with her old
boyfriend yet. She also made a point of telling me that she
didn't want to get into what she called the ‘I love you
stuff’. She said it was fake and she wanted to ‘keep things
fun’. In spite of this, I believed I was happier than I had
been in a long while because I wasn't cutting. It wasn't that
the urge had gone — it hadn't, it was there, strong as ever,
seductive as ever: how I craved the simplicity of shrinking
my problems into the sweep of a razor blade across my
skin — it was just that I was terrified of what she would do
if she knew. Just like I was terrified of what my parents
would do if they knew.


‘Why? How can they tell if I'm happy? Besides, I
stopped seeing that asshole psychiatrist months ago.’


She shook her head. A fine spray flew from her hair.


‘Do whatever you think is best,’ she said.


I went into the bathroom and flushed them goodbye.

[p. <i>61</i>]

‘Laura? I'm telling you I love you, doesn't that mean
anything?’


It was September 1990. Mike and I had moved into an
old place in Deptford. She wouldn't move into a house
with Chloe until a few days before our second year started.


‘You know I do,’ she said through clenched teeth.


All summer, the lack of definition had been eating away
at me. I didn't want to share her. I wanted her all to myself.


‘How am I supposed to know if you don't tell me?’


‘You just should.’


‘I need to hear you say it.’


‘This is getting boring, I have to go.’


‘Why?’


‘I'm going out in a minute.’


‘So that's it?’


‘Bye Nick. I've got to run.’


She hung up on me. I went to the refrigerator, pulled out
the chilled litre of white wine that I was saving for another
night, plopped myself down in one of the big old armchairs
and drank.


Once term began, Laura and I argued all the time about her
refusal to commit to our relationship. The more intense I
got, the more she ran from me. I'd be out drinking with
Mike and see her flirting with other men at the campus bar.
If I asked her what she was doing, she'd laugh and tell me
that I was ‘too possessive’. Mike kept telling me that Laura

[p. <i>62</i>]

We were at the campus bar. It was Tequila Night. Shots
for 50p. Laura and I got so drunk that we couldn't stop
laughing. Tears streaming down our faces, cheekbones
aching from the inside out. Suddenly, she threw her arms
around me and told me she loved me. It was the first time
she had said it. She took my hand and led me down to the
toilets. After checking that no one was in the female
toilets, she rushed me into a cubicle and bolted the door

[p. <i>63</i>]

Mike dared me to shoot a glass of vodka through my nose.
He said he had heard that it got you really drunk. I lay
back on the carpet. He handed me a glass. I raised my head
and pinched my right nostril shut. I held the shot glass to
my left nostril and tipped it back. I saw stars. Carnivals.
Ferris wheels. Bright lights. Candy-floss. My funeral.
Granite stone. The rest of the night, we drank vodka
shots the regular way. Later, I threw up all over myself,
down my front, in my lap, all over the carpet.


This latest ‘honeymoon’ was over in a matter of days. As
soon as she was better, Laura went back to her old ways:
the letters and hushed phone calls, the games. It got so we
couldn't be in the same room. We were like two fighting
cats. Our love became a scab that neither of us could stop
picking at. One day I was too tired to pick any more. And
then, when I was exhausted, the depression rolled over me
like it always did.

[p. <i>64</i>]

There were days when I didn't get out of bed until it was
dark. On others I didn't go to bed at all. I rarely went to
classes. The kitchen sink was stacked high with dirty
dishes. I was too tired to run a bath, shave, wash my
hair. Mike — keen to avoid the stench of my decay — spent
increasing amounts of time at his brother's house. I wore
the same clothes day in, day out. I couldn't see any point in
changing them. Sometimes my eyes would open and I'd
find myself fully clothed, a can of beer by my bed. I rang
people all the time. I called my mother every day to talk
about my latest argument with Laura. I often called
Dennis in the early hours of the morning, waking him
up to tell him I was thinking of killing myself. I never
remembered making these calls until Dennis rang the next
day to see if I was still alive. He would tell me what I had
said and I would feel ashamed. I'm sorry, I'd say, another
mantra that now coursed through my everyday life. I'm
sorry.


The cutting was back too. Laura got hysterical when she
saw cuts for the first time. She said I was ‘sick’ and called
me ‘a freak’. No matter how hard I tried to explain that it
helped me, that it made things easier, more tolerable, the
look of disgust and revulsion on her face wouldn't shift.
Another night, she called by to find I'd cut again and it was
too much for her.


‘Why don't you just kill yourself and get it over with?’

[p. <i>65</i>]

Laura didn't understand. I stared at her through a
blizzard of tears. We'd been going out for six months
and still she didn't get ‘it’, just like nobody got ‘it’. I
didn't want to die. That was my biggest fear, the last
thing I wanted to happen. I wanted to kill the depression
though. I wanted to murder it. To bleed it out of
my body.


‘Is that a no?’ she shouted. ‘Is it?’


I nodded.


‘What's wrong with you?’ I said.


‘What's wrong with me? How can you ask that?
You're the fucked-up mess, not me. I'm going to call
your parents in the morning and tell them that you're out
of control.’


‘Don't you dare.’


‘Why not?’


Long pause.


‘Because it would kill them if they knew about this.’


She stubbed her cigarette out and poured herself another
shot of vodka. I took the bottle out of her hand and
swigged from it. We didn't say anything for ten, maybe
fifteen minutes. Then, in stony silence, when the vodka ran
out, we made love on the floor, half-dressed. Afterwards,
she crawled into bed. I lit a cigarette and went in search of
a half-drunk, stale can of beer that I remembered seeing on
the kitchen window sill earlier in the evening.

[p. <i>66</i>]

Alcohol's winter lullabies sang me into a black trance.
Laura's love was a slap in the face. My face was a sheet of
white paper with two eyes, a nose and a mouth drawn on
it. The house was empty. The orange plastic rectangular
casing called me to the bathroom. I took it in my hands. I
put it under my shoe. The razor blade slipped free. It was
like watching Laura pull her dress over her head. The
nakedness astonished me. I dragged the blade across the
inside of my arm, once, twice, three times and then the
music carried me away. Endorphins rushed like champagne
bubbles to the scene of the crime. There was a
commotion in my body. I was far away, on a mental
holiday, walking sandy beaches, the sun burning my skin.
When I came back, there was pain. Not a bad kind of pain.
But an understanding pain. A physical pain that was better
than the sick drone of my depressive brain spiralling into
coffins of twisted logic. I poured another gigantic glass of
vodka. I sipped at it, blood streaking my skin like a blind
painter's brush-strokes, the deafening thunderstorm of my
thoughts reduced to the drip-drip of post-cutting relief.


‘Is going insane a real fear for you?’


My doctor was eyeing me with concern. I'd seen her so
many times by this point that it felt like she was no longer
sure what to do with me.


‘I guess so.’


I had told her that I thought I was going insane. This

[p. <i>67</i>]

She tapped her pen on her knee.


‘I don't know what to suggest,’ she said. ‘I can put you
back on antidepressants or I can refer you to the medical
centre's counselling team. What do you want to do?’


I didn't want any more pills. I was sick of them.


‘I think I need to talk to someone.’


‘Let's try counselling then. The first step is for you to
make an appointment to see one of the counsellors for a
psychiatric evaluation. Then, based on what the counselor
decides, we'll take it from there. OK? Go back to the
reception and make an appointment.’ The receptionist
said that it was going to be ten days before I could see
a counsellor.


Ten days ...


A woman in her mid-thirties called out my name. I
followed her upstairs to her office. She reminded me of
an actress. I couldn't think which one at first and then it
came to me: she looked a bit like Debra Winger.


‘My name is Veronica,’ she said, sitting down in a black
leather armchair. ‘I'm going to do the psychiatric evaluation.’


A tall, healthy tree stood behind, outside, beyond the
window. During our weekly sessions, which would last for
the next eighteen months, this tree watched me shiver and
sweat through the different seasons. I sat down in another
leather armchair opposite her. There was a table to my
left, with a box of tissues and a spider plant on it.

[p. <i>68</i>]

‘First, I have to tell you that if you appear to be in
danger of harming yourself or others, I have to inform
your doctor.’


I knew that I would — under no circumstances — mention
the cutting.


‘I understand.’


The walls closed in on me. I was scared.


‘It's also important’, she added, ‘that you're as honest as
you can be at all times.’


‘I'll do my best,’ I said.


Veronica asked me a lot of questions and made notes as
I answered them. She wanted to know what symptoms I
was experiencing and ran through a check-list (I answered
yes to all of them); how much I drank (as much as my
friends: the usual lie), how much I smoked (forty a day),
did I take drugs? (no: another lie), why had I not wanted
antidepressants? (they don't work: a delusion), had I seen
a counsellor before? (no), was I in a relationship? (yes),
what was that like? (dysfunctional, destructive, mutually
abusive: not that I knew this then), what-was my relationship
with my family like? (good but I was keeping a lot of
secrets from them), was I having problems with my course
work? (just getting by), how and when I had been depressed
before? (a long story), was I suicidal? (no: maybe).
I watered every answer down, making sure the response
stayed within my perception of what constituted ‘normal’
and what constituted ‘get locked up’.


‘I think you are suffering from a combination of severe
depression and anxiety,’ she concluded, her diagnosis
rhyming beautifully with the ones that came before. ‘I
recommend that you start seeing a counsellor here on a
weekly basis who can work through some of your problems

[p. <i>69</i>]

‘OK.’


I had a lump in my throat. It felt right. No more pills.
But instead this ...


‘Would you like to see me or another female counsellor
or a male counsellor?’


‘I would like to see you,’ I said.


She smiled. It was an ‘I get you’ smile. Hope spilled from
her mouth.


What happened over the next eighteen months between
me and Veronica in that little room remains sacred, almost
holy in my memory. It was step one of many. It was a start.
It was the beginning of me turning my life around. She
taught me how to analyse my moods, how to examine
insurmountable feelings from a different perspective, how
to decipher emotions that I wanted to run from, how to
identify behavioural patterns, how to understand why I
did what I did, how to see my life as a grid of repetitions
and motifs, how our relationships with others are reflections
of our inner selves, how we develop coping systems
and mechanisms that are dangerous and unhealthy. Our
work together was slow. Often painfully so. She was
always fighting my self-destructiveness, my tendency to
shut down, to close off, to become unreachable. She'd
push me and I would resent her. I'd run from her and she'd
resent me. Sometimes I'd show up hung over and sick just
to spite her. Sometimes I'd be eager to please and would

[p. <i>70</i>]

‘Trying to run away from your problems isn't the
answer. The amount you're drinking is not only damaging
your health, it's also clouding over any hope of you
resolving your problems. Until you step out from this
mask, things are going to stay foggy.’


Veronica sat back in her chair, never breaking direct eye
contact. I'd been seeing her for two months. There was a
deliberate pause and then she said it.


‘I think you're an alcoholic.’


I looked away. We sat there in silence, me red and
flustered, staring out at the tree, until the session came to
an end.


Laura and I split up just before term ended. She said we
needed to take a ‘holiday’ from each other and, rather
than fight any more, I agreed. Once the Easter break
started, I knew I wouldn't see Veronica for a month.
On the first night, I was alone. Mike had gone to his
parents' house to get some revision done. I knew I'd hit a
dead end. Either I stopped killing myself with drink and
nailed down to some exam revision or I kept drinking. I
took the sensible option, drank four cans of beer and went
to bed at 9pm. I woke up at 8am feeling refreshed, having
slept right through the night. As if fate had been working
while I was asleep, a packet from my mother arrived in the

[p. <i>71</i>]

Veronica wasn't impressed. I sat opposite her, a colossal
hangover making me sweat and cough.


‘Why would you take Laura back? She said that she was
with her old boyfriend for the whole of Easter. Why can't
you leave it alone?’


Once I had taken and passed all of my exams — thanks
to my alcohol-as-reward system working its magic — I
spent a lot of time with Laura. We got along well for a
fortnight, drinking, making love, having fun ... it was
like the old days. Honeymoon number 103.


‘I thought things would be different this time.’


I hadn't seen her at all over Easter. I thought we were
finished. She dropped by the night before the exams
started. She said that the ski instructor had been back

[p. <i>72</i>]

‘And was it different this time?’


The harmony vanished as it always did and then we
were fighting again about the same tired things: her on/off
ex-boyfriend, the games she played, my drinking.


‘For a week or two.’


Veronica sighed.


‘Why can't you see she's bad for you?’


‘Because I love her.’


I broke into another coughing fit.


‘Drinking and smoking damage the immune system.
Are you aware that you're destroying your health?’


I couldn't answer her because I was coughing so hard.


‘You're wrecking your body.’


‘I know.’


The problem was, by this point, getting drunk was as
natural for me as cleaning my teeth. It was just something I
did.


It came from nowhere. Whoosh. A sudden wash of bile.
Mike and I had been out drinking. I ran to the bathroom,
fighting to keep it down. And then I vomited. A jet, a
wave, a hurricane. There hadn't been any time to turn the
lights on. My nostrils stung from the ferocity of the
vomiting. I retched several times. I groped around in
the dark for the toilet paper, tore off a handful and wiped

[p. <i>73</i>]

It was a Saturday night. Laura and I had split up again. I
was home alone, guzzling wine in front of a depressing
episode of <i>Thirtysomething</i>. A plot thread in the show —
maybe Nancy having cancer, Gary dying, I don't remember
what — upset me. I went to the bathroom and got a
razor blade. I made several cuts on my arms. Drops of
blood fell on to my grubby white T-shirt, bloomed like red
roses and wilted into dark red stains.


On the last night of term, I saw Laura across a crowded
bar. I blanked her. She blanked me. I was drinking and
flirting with a girl from my course called Claudia. I asked
Claudia if she wanted to go back to my flat and split a

[p. <i>74</i>]

I spent four weeks that summer travelling around the
States on a Greyhound bus. It was a gift from my parents
for my twenty-first birthday. It was also an attempt to
shock me back to life. When my father had taken me to
New York before it had worked. They were desperate to
‘fix’ me and this was their latest plan. I remember I got a
lump in my throat when they suggested it because they
were trying so hard and I didn't know how to tell them
that there was nothing they could do to help me.


I got on a bus in New York — after spending a week on a
friend's sofa — and travelled straight down the East Coast.
I arrived in Athens, Georgia, wracked by DTs, in a
frazzled, paranoid state. Once I'd checked into a motel,
I went to the liquor store across the street. It was just after
10am and already 94 degrees in the sun. I bought a bottle
of Rebel Yell bourbon, some Coke, a bag of ice and a pack
of Winstons. By mid afternoon, I'd drunk the bottle of
Rebel Yell and the air conditioning had given me an ice
cream headache. I went into the bathroom. I coughed.
Something had been tickling the back of my throat. I spat
a big blood-ball, fleshy and disgusting, into the sink. I
coughed and a twin, misshapen and spotted as a crushed

[p. <i>75</i>]

‘That was close!’ she said, laughing.


It was 1 am. I had arrived in Houston direct from
Athens six days earlier.


I was in a jeep with a complete stranger.


‘Tell me about it,’ I replied.


She had just run a red light and nearly broad-sided a
camper van.


She pulled into a 24-hour liquor store. I didn't even
know her name.


‘This OK?’ she asked, holding up two sixpacks of cheap
beer.


‘Sure,’ I said.


We got back in her jeep. I lit the cigarette that she had
just flipped up to her mouth.


‘Aaah,’ she moaned. ‘Sweet nicotine.’


We tore out of the parking lot, tyres screeching. She
pulled into the traffic without even looking.


‘Shit,’ she said as we got hooted at by another mob of
angry drivers.


She ran another red light.


‘Hand me a beer will you?’


I pulled another can free, opened it and put it in her

[p. <i>76</i>]

‘Fuck that was good,’ she said and took a hit off a
lukewarm, half-drunk beer that had been waiting ever
since we came out of the shower and devoured one
another. We were lying wrapped up together in some
sheets on the cheap, scratchy carpet.


‘I know,’ I said and kissed her.


She spat a mouthful of beer into my mouth. I wanted to
ask her who she was, but it was already too late for that.


The bus was tearing through the middle of Iowa when they
appeared on the horizon — thousands and thousands of
tractors. I rubbed my eyes with the back of my hand. Still
there. Brand new, shiny tractors. Rows and rows of them, as
far as I could see, in lines, in formations, the symmetry
perfect. I looked around the bus to see if anyone else could
see them but everyone was asleep. The sun was coming up. I
hadn't slept all night and thought the DTs were playing
tricks on my mind. I'd picked up a connection somewhere in
Arkansas around four that morning. I was travelling from
Houston to Minneapolis. By 10am, the sun was wide
awake. I was smoking a cigarette and sipping on a coffee
that made my hands shake even more. The Greyhound
depot was next to a drug rehab clinic. People with grey faces

[p. <i>77</i>]

My last year at university, I lived in a faded Victorian
house on the Peckham — New Cross border with eight other
Goldsmiths' students. Mike had moved in with his younger
brother and, after breaking up with Laura, I was left
estranged from her and most of our friends. I thought the
neutrality of strangers would be a calming influence. My
new flatmates turned out to be as damaged as I was: an
anorexic, a speed freak, a stoner bulimic-nymphomaniac,
a sports fanatic who burned himself whenever he got
stressed out, two born-again Christians, a hypochondriac
MA student and a bulimic fresher.


On the first night of the new term, I was staggering around
the campus bar drunk to the eyeballs, looking for a
familiar face, when I ran into Laura.


‘Hi. How was your summer?’


‘Good. And yours?’


The tension between us was taut, cheese-wire sharp.


‘OK.’


Then there was awkward silence. And then we both said

[p. <i>78</i>]

‘You look good.’


We both laughed at the stereophonic statement. I didn't
want us to start up again though.


‘I've got to go now,’ I told her. ‘I've got a drink waiting.’


‘You're still drinking then,’ she said.


Nirvana's <i>Nevermind</i> was playing over the bar PA.


‘Look, I've got to go.’


She grabbed the sleeve of my jacket.


‘Fancy a quick fuck in the toilets?’


I wanted her. More than anything. But not like that.


‘I've got a drink waiting. I've got to run.’


I didn't look at her or wait for her response. I pushed off
into the crowd, my step heavy, reluctant.


Every Tuesday, I saw Veronica at 10 am. I always paced
my drinking on Monday nights so I wouldn't sleep
through the alarm clock. She and I hit a stalemate. Her
words didn't work any more. She would tell me how ill I
looked and repeat again and again that she thought I was
an alcoholic but I didn't want to hear any of it.


‘Why have you given up?’ she kept asking me.


‘I haven't,’ I'd snap back.


‘You have. Look at you. You've got another nasty cough.
You look terrible. Why are you doing this to yourself?’


I was staring at my fingers. They were stained yellow
from smoking too much.


‘If I knew that, I wouldn't be here would I?’

[p. <i>79</i>]

Cheap wine boxes. A gift to the unrepentant alcoholic. I
worked out that each one was equivalent to four bottles of
wine. I started to stay in on Saturday nights. I'd settle in front
of the TV at 5pm with a red wine box. I'd talk to other people
in the house, about what was on TV, the weather, where they
were going that night. They would go off to their rooms and
get dressed up. When they'd all gone out, I would sit on my
own, watching a film, filling my glass over and over again. It
was slow drinking, slow suicide. I just sat there and sipped
my wine, neither sober nor drunk. Eventually people in the
house would start to come home. They would make snide
comments about how I was still in the same faded armchair,
still hooked up to my wine box like it was an IV drip.
Midnight would tip-toe past. The first ones home would
start yawning and then they'd go to bed. The others staggered
through the front door, joining me for cigarettes, trying
and failing to get me to give them a glass of my precious wine.
By 3 am, they would all be back or in bed. I always knew that
the fun was over when the last person came home. Sometime
after, I would lean over to re-fill my glass and find that the
box was empty. I learned all the tricks. I would rip open the
cardboard box and take out the bag. If I squeezed really hard,
I would be able to milk a final glass of wine out of that bag,
the last drops of wine dripping into the glass like blood.


When I met Maria, I was lost in a twilight zone of
promiscuity. Veronica had long since nailed this as just

[p. <i>80</i>]

‘Why do you have to get so drunk all the time?’ she
complained as we sat listening to Hole in my room, a
growing mountain of crumpled beer cans by my side.


‘Because it keeps me sane.’


It was my stock line by then, part of a well-rehearsed
speech.


‘Do you really believe that?’


She was closing in on the truth like an amateur Veronica.


‘Maybe.’


‘I think you're an alcoholic.’


She spat the word out like it was the most disgusting
word in the English language.


‘That's ridiculous.’


‘I'm serious. You need to get help.’


I got up to flip the record over, the needle aptly stuck in
a groove.


Veronica and I sat in silence.


‘You're going to die if you keep this up.’


I told her that I'd thrown up blood again the night
before. I felt like shit. I couldn't stop though. I couldn't
find the trail of salt back to where it had all begun.

[p. <i>81</i>]

‘What is behind all of this?’ she said, exasperated.


I had missed our previous session because it came after a
four-day binge. When the sports nut who was always
burning himself got hold of a sack of magic mushrooms,
all of us — bar the born-again Christians — took them. The
night after, every one in the house took them again —
cleaning his stash out. I got drunk on both nights too. So I
was planning a quiet night in — with a wine box — when
Paul turned up on my doorstep straight off a coach from
Cardiff. He had a gram of speed with him which we ended
up sharing. When he cleared off the next day, Mike came
over with a bag of weed that his brother had given him.
When I woke up on Tuesday morning, to the sound of my
alarm clock swearing obscenities, I was too wrecked to go
and see Veronica, so I just went back to sleep.


‘I don't: know. I don't know. I don't know.’


Maria kept harping on about my drinking and I got sick of
it. I didn't want to spend all our dates talking about how
much I drank. She had to go. She turned up one Saturday
afternoon, rousing me from a filthy hangover. I'd been out
shooting double vodka-Pernods with Mike the night before.
She sat on my bed and said she was worried about
me. She'd heard about my recent binge and was scared.
She begged me to go to an Alcoholics Anonymous meeting.
I laughed and told her to mind her own business.
When she asked me to give her one good reason why I
wouldn't go, I said, Because I'm not an alcoholic. She
stormed off without saying goodbye.

[p. <i>82</i>]

Kim, the anorexic girl who lived in the basement, opened
her door. I made some small talk about whatever film I'd
been watching up in the lounge and then asked if I could
talk to her. She invited me in and I sat down on her bed.


‘Did you drink all of that yourself?’ she asked, pointing
at the empty bottle of bourbon in my hand.


‘Yes,’ I said. ‘And I'm not even drunk.’


She had such a beautiful face. Her suffering had made a
saint of her.


‘What did you want to talk to me about?’


‘That.’


I knew she got it because she was so out there herself.


‘What do you want to do about it?’


Her cheekbones were sharp and tragic.


‘I want to stop.’


We talked for a long time about my drinking and then
she asked me if I wanted her to call AA for me. I said yes. I
was ready.


We went up to the lounge. It was late, maybe 2 am. She
found the number for AA in the phone book and dialled it.
She handed me the receiver and left the room.


‘Hello?’


‘Hi, is this Alcoholics Anonymous?’


‘Yes. How can I help?’


A gruff male voice. Stern, not that friendly.


‘I have a problem with my drinking.’


‘What's your name?’


‘Nick.’


He told me his name.

[p. <i>83</i>]

‘Are you drunk right now, Nick?’


‘No. I drank a bottle of whisky tonight and it didn't
even get me drunk.’


‘Do you want to stop drinking?’


‘Yes.’


‘You need to come to a meeting then. Could you make a
meeting this coming morning?’


Panic. Denial. If you do this, you can't drink any more.
Quick. Do something.


‘The earliest I could make is in the afternoon.’


‘I would recommend that you go to a meeting as soon as
possible.’


‘But I can only make the afternoon or early evening.’


I could hear myself back-pedalling. I could hear the sudden
terror in my voice. What was I doing? Alcoholics call AA...


‘I can send a member of the fellowship to pick you up
tomorrow at a quarter to four. Where are you?’


I gave him my address. It was too late. I'd said it. Now
he knew. So did Kim. So did Maria. So did Veronica. So
did everyone...


‘Someone will come for you later this afternoon. Now
try to get some rest.’


I thanked him and hung up. I lit a cigarette. There was
no sound anywhere, not in the house, not outside. Everyone
else was asleep.


‘Is this Alcoholics Anonymous?’


‘Yes it is,’ responded a deep, smooth voice. ‘How can
we help?’

[p. <i>84</i>]

‘Well, last night, things got out of hand and I called
you.’


The hangover was brutal. It was the middle of the
afternoon, sometime in early December 1991. I'd just
woken up. I was starting to wonder just how sober I
had really been the night before. Going down to ask Kim
for help. Calling AA.


‘Why did you call?’


‘Well, I thought I was drinking too much and whoever I
spoke to said that they were going to send someone around
to collect me this evening and take me to a meeting.’


My voice was shaky. I tried to clear my throat.


‘And?’


And? And I need a drink. And I don't want any of this
AA crap. And I wish I'd never called.


‘I don't need anyone to come around today. I'm fine.
Can I just leave it please?’


Dead air.


‘I'm fine, really.’


Not even the sound of his breathing.


‘Thanks,’ I said and hung up.


I went back upstairs to my room and opened a beer.


Two days into 1992, I was sitting alone in the lounge at
my parents' house. I had the bottle of Rémy Martin that
someone had given my father for Christmas beside me. It
was empty. Earlier, I had been to a pub with Paul and
drunk a couple of pints. Then I came home and drank the
bottle of brandy, watching MTV.

[p. <i>85</i>]

‘What the hell are you doing?’


My sister had just come home and stumbled in on my
private party. She was still at school and still living at home.


‘Watching TV.’


She shook the bottle.


‘It's empty,’ she said. ‘You haven't drunk the whole
bottle have you?’


‘Why?’


‘It's not yours!’


She sighed and went upstairs to get ready for bed. I crept
into the kitchen and scooped up the bottle of Rebel Yell
that I was saving for a special occasion. I took it into the
lounge, tore the cap off and started drinking straight from
the bottle. I was about a quarter of the way through it
when the door swung open again.


‘For god's sake! Go to bed!’ my sister hissed, trying not
to wake my parents who were sleeping above us.


‘No,’ I said, watching U2 play ‘All I Want Is You’.


‘What's that?’


‘What?’ I said, again ignoring her.


‘That bottle.’


‘It's a bottle of Rebel Yell.’


‘Have you lost your mind?’


She snatched the bottle away from me. For a second, we
were children again and it was one of those stupid games
we used to play. She told me again to go to bed. This time I
did. I staggered upstairs and into the bathroom. I squeezed
toothpaste on to my brush. Half of it went into the sink.
There were two, three, four, five toothbrushes. I was
trying to figure out which one was real and which ones
were imaginary when I spun round and vomited into the
toilet. There was a lot of blood. Not just snotty red strings

[p. <i>86</i>]

‘How do you feel sober?’ she asked me.


There was relief on Veronica's face. Only now, a year
into this, were we really getting somewhere. I hadn't
touched a drop since seeing all that blood in the toilet.
After yet more ‘we're worried about the amount you
drink’ lectures from my parents and sister (and naturally,
I told no one about the blood nor did I see a doctor), I side-stepped
their concern by going cold turkey. When term
began again, I researched stomach ulcers in the university
library and discovered that they usually heal in six weeks. I
figured that I had something similar, so I put a six-week
deadline on my sobriety. Six weeks... and then I'd be
able to drink as much as I wanted. By the time I was sitting
in Veronica's office — two and a half weeks sober — the
craving had cooled off and had now taken on the intensity
of suffocating or drowning.


‘Lost. Confused. Bored. Sick of not being able to sleep.
Uptight. Angry. Agitated. Restless.’


‘Why?’


‘Because now my life is like a black-and-white TV.
When I drank it was a colour TV. All the colour's gone.’


‘Why do you need alcohol to make life interesting?’


Interesting? I need alcohol to breathe...


‘Because it opens me up, gets rid of that stiffness, shuts
all of that crap up.’

[p. <i>87</i>]

‘And hangovers, bronchitis, vomiting blood. Those
things are a fair exchange?’


‘Of course not. I don't know what all that health stuff is
about.’


‘It's about wanting to hurt yourself.’


‘Maybe.’


‘Not maybe. It is. The drinking, the drugs. It's all a way
to damage feelings that you find too painful to live with.’


She knew about the drugs. If only she knew about the
cutting...


‘I suppose so.’


‘How are your friends treating you?’


‘They're keeping their distance.’


‘Why do you think that is?’


‘They don't like me unless I'm out of control.’


‘What makes you say that?’


‘The facts. They're keeping me at arm's length.’


‘Does that bother you?’


‘It makes me want to drink again. I feel like I've done
something wrong.’


‘Which is?’


‘Be myself.’


Laura and I collided in a pub next to campus. She asked
me if it was true that I had quit drinking. I said it was.


‘Damn you,’ she scowled, her hand wrapped tight
around a pint of beer. ‘I put up with all that shit from
you and now you go and sort yourself out.’


‘I wouldn't say I've sorted myself out. I'm trying to.’

[p. <i>88</i>]

‘You seem like you're doing really well. You've lost
weight.’


I had. The pounds were just falling off me. Two packs of
cigarettes a day, a lot of coffee, hardly any sleep.


‘Do you want to come back to my place for a chat and
some coffee?’ she asked, smiling in her coy way.


I could picture Veronica shaking her head and pleading
with me not to go.


‘I don't know,’ I said.


‘Come on. Let's go.’


I wanted to say no but I couldn't. She made coffee and
we sat on her bed talking. She got sentimental — something
she never did — and opened a drawer full of cassettes. I
could see my handwriting on dozens of tape sleeves.


‘I still listen to all the tapes you made for me.’


She put one on. The album just happened to be one that
had often played backdrop to our arguments. We kissed,
fell into bed, made love, her tongue tasting of beer, her
kisses getting me drunk.


On Valentine's Day, I started drinking again. I don't know
what happened. It might have been the tangled emotions
that came with loving Laura, it might have been the
sterility of my new home in a hall of residence on campus
for final-year students, it might have been the amount of
course work I had, it might just have been because I
stubbed my toe that morning. I spent almost an hour in
a pub with Mike agonising over whether or not to have a
drink. Mike's take on all this was that I should get a drink

[p. <i>89</i>]

‘It's Valentine's Day,’ slurred Mike, his eyes rolling.
‘Who do you love?’


I pointed at my pint of beer. Neither of us laughed.


A few weeks later, I ran into Maria in the campus bar.


‘Why didn't you come and see me?’


I'd woken up two days earlier to find a note from Maria
by my bed asking me to drop by.


‘I've been busy,’ I said, wondering why she was so
angry.


‘Busy? You bastard. You weren't too busy when you
wanted to fuck me were you?’


She was furious. Her silver nose ring, catching an
overhead light, blinded me for a moment.


‘What? What are you talking about?’


My memory shrugged. It didn't have any answers
either.


‘Don't you remember?’


‘Remember what?’


I remembered that she and I had gone out drinking, that
we went back to my room to drink bourbon, that she

[p. <i>90</i>]

‘Us sleeping together the other night?’


I remembered getting into bed with her.


‘We slept together?’


She looked at me. There were tears in her eyes.


‘You don't remember do you?’


I didn't remember anything.


‘You bastard! I fucking hate you!’


And then she walked away.


I got bronchitis again. I resented the antibiotics and still
drank on them. Veronica was at the end of her rope with
me.


‘Everything was going so well for you. Why did you
have to go and blow it?’


I had blown it. It was so easy to be drunk, to be out of
control. I could be everything I wasn't when sober. I was
deluded of course, equating alcohol with a better ‘me’.
Veronica, who had started to become more aggressive with
me, snapped at this last session before the Easter break.


‘You are an alcoholic. You're making the depression
worse, the anxiety worse. You're wrecking your kidneys,
your liver, your lungs, your heart. You've got bronchitis
again. You come here and cough and splutter. Why can't
you see what you drinking is doing to your health? You're
killing yourself.’


I went home for Easter, relieved to get away from her
for four weeks.

[p. <i>91</i>]

‘Do you know who I am?’ I asked Paul when I first arrived
at the hospital.


He stared straight through me.


‘It's me,’ I said. ‘Nick.’


No flicker of recognition, nothing.


‘Do you know who I am?’


Still nothing. The first any of us knew about Paul's
nervous breakdown was when his mother called and told
me that he had been flown back from Spain and admitted
to the psychiatric wing of the hospital I once worked at.


‘I am Batman,’ he said after a long silence. ‘I am Batman.’


He spread his arms out like wings and began to run up
and down the length of the ward. I watched him, arms
outstretched, a maniacal grin on his face.


When I came home for Easter break, I went out on the
first night back with Dennis and Paul, like we always did.
Paul was wound up tight, fit to snap, but we thought that
was down to the amount of coke, ecstasy and speed he'd
been taking. He was also revising for finals, going on long
runs every morning, planning to start his own travel
company and making frequent trips to Madrid where
he was screening reps for his business. He sat in the
pub and talked us through a big fat business start-up
plan. We had no idea what he was going on about.


‘I am Batman!’ he yelled every so often.


I tried to stop him by grabbing his arm whenever he
passed me but he shook my hand off each time.


‘I am Batman!’


He was now shouting it loudly enough for a nurse to

[p. <i>92</i>]

They kept Paul in hospital for four months. He missed his
finals — his mother had to defer his exams for a year. The
medication wiped him out. He jumbled up his words, had
trouble remembering anything and worst of all, got into a
habit of drooling. As he came around, he became aware of
where he was. I visited him almost every day for the rest of
the Easter break. I cooled my drinking off. I didn't want to
end up like that. Lost in one of those medication cages.
Trapped in one of those breakdown palaces. I remember
Dennis saying to me after we visited Paul together that he
couldn't understand why Paul had cracked up. I always
thought you were the one who was going to snap, he said,
as we drove out of the hospital driveway. He was right. It
should have been me...


Paul used to take me to the smoking room. The first time
we went in there, a woman asked me if I would drive her
to a Barclays bank. I didn't know what else to say, so I said
I would. Then, every time a visitor like me, someone from
‘out there’ as she put it, came into the room she asked
them too. Within an hour, she had four offers of a ride to
the bank. Paul and I tried to talk but it was impossible. A
man with wild white hair and a shaggy beard kept interrupting
us and asking me if I could bring him some
Guinness next time I visited Paul. A stick-thin girl, who
couldn't have been older than sixteen, sobbed in the
corner. I wanted to comfort her but it wasn't my place.

[p. <i>93</i>]

The patients started fights about everything — the nurses,
the chairs, the weather — and every time I left that room, I
thought I was going crazy too. I always thought the same
thing driving home: how can Paul get better in a place
where everyone is broken?


I was tired. I had cleared months of revision in a matter of
weeks. I was going to sit my finals in less than a month. I
plopped myself down next to Paul on his bed. He put his
face in his hands. I didn't know what to say. The man in
the bed across from us was masturbating. Paul got up and
wandered over to a table between two beds.


‘What about a game of scrabble?’ he asked, pointing at
a scrabble board.


‘OK,’ I said, hopeful that he was coming round.


He tipped the letters out. We pulled two chairs over to
the table.


‘You start,’ I said.


‘Hmmm,’ he mumbled, pushing a tile or two around.


After some deliberation, he cleared the board of tiles.


‘Are you going to start?’ I said.


‘I have started,’ he said.


‘But you haven't put a tile down yet.’


‘Yes I have,’ he said.


His eyes were glassy.


‘I've put seven tiles down.’


The board was blank.


‘Which letters?’


‘Whichever ones you want,’ he muttered.


‘You've put down seven letters — do they make a word
or are they just random letters?’


‘It's a word.’

[p. <i>94</i>]

‘Which word is it? It would help if I knew so I can think
about what letter to put down next.’


He stared at me.


‘I've told you,’ he said, getting irritable. ‘It's whatever
you want it to be.’


The sun was streaming in the windows and picking out the
highlights in Veronica's hair. It was our last session. My
finals were over. I'd got through them by the usual
method: I stuck a fourpack of Colt 45 in the refrigerator
every morning and allowed myself that ice-cold reward
when I finished each day's revision. Everything was closing
down, I was about to move back to my parents' house.


‘Why didn't you go to hospital and get stitches?’


Ten days earlier, there was a free drinks party at my
hall, a customary farewell to those about to graduate.
Mike and I got so drunk that I fell on to a wine glass that
someone had left on the floor of my room. The glass had
folded out like one of those nature documentaries that
shows the speeded-up process of a flower in bloom, and
the stem had punctured my knee-cap.


‘I don't know.’


‘But if there was that much blood, why didn't you do
something?’


The drinking went on all night. When I fell on the glass,
I soaked a towel through with blood. Then the bleeding
stopped. And there was more free alcohol. The party ran
on until the next morning. I got a few hours' sleep before
the pain woke me. My knee was badly swollen. I couldn't

[p. <i>95</i>]

‘Look at you now,’ Veronica said. ‘You've got a terrible
limp.’


I didn't care. I was just pissed off that I'd blown all the
wild drinking days that I dreamed of during all those beer-rationed
revision days.


‘How do you feel about graduating?’


Butterflies in my stomach. No Sale signs in my eyes.


‘I think I need to get out of this place.’


She ran a hand through her hair. There was nothing left
to say.


Time was up.


New York was a sprawling mess. Sweltering heat. It was
July 1992. I was fresh out of university and staying with
my friend Jennifer for a week. She had gone to work and
left me sleeping on her couch. I'd woken up hung over,
taken a shower, gone out to get some brunch and then
picked up a chilled sixpack of Coors. I spent the afternoon
up on the roof of her apartment building, sunbathing,
smoking cigarettes and drinking beer. All of Manhattan
lay before me, smouldering, burning, choking. Everything
looked so unreal from the thirty-ninth floor of a skyscraper
block. Cars became ants, people: specks of dust. I
tried to imagine what it would be like to be a bird and fall

[p. <i>96</i>]

‘Is that all you ever do?’ she said. ‘You're going to kill
yourself if you don't slow down.’


I raised the can to my mouth in mock-theatrical fashion
and drained its contents. I banged the empty can down on
the table and sighed.


‘Hi Annie,’ I said. ‘Good day at work?’


She waved her hand at me and vanished into her bedroom,
slamming the door behind her. I smiled a sad smile.


It was my last night in New York. Jennifer and I got
hammered at a bar on St Mark's Place with her boyfriend,
Richard. We were heading back to her apartment in a taxi
when I started to feel ill. I spent the next two hours
throwing up blood in her bathroom. She begged me to
let her take me to a hospital. I told her to forget it because
it happened all the time and I was always fine the next
morning. Eventually she grew tired of watching me retch
and went to bed. When the alarm clock went off at
5.30am, she woke me up with a cup of coffee. She had
booked me a cab to JFK so I could catch my early bird
flight back to London. I staggered into the bathroom and
vomited blood again. She insisted on making French toast
for me. It'll make you feel much better, she kept saying.


I was in such a bad state that I couldn't even look at what

[p. <i>97</i>]

What's the soft thing? asked one of the three security
guards. I had set off the metal detectors at JFK. I had
already emptied a pocket full of coins. Icy beads of sweat
pushed their toboggans off my shoulders. Soft thing? Oh
that, I said and took out the rectangle-shaped piece of foil.
They shot glances at one another. Drop it in the bowl,
growled the tallest of the guards. I did as he said. He
unwrapped the foil. Inside: two pieces of soggy French
toast. They laughed and waved me through.


The departure lounge was littered with cleaners. Everywhere
I looked, mops were being dipped in buckets and
dragged across floors. Arms, elbows and hands were
sleepily operating brooms and carts. Industrial buffing
machines were being swung from left to right, their hissing
engines gliding just above the grime and the dirt. It was
like watching ballet ...


The stench of disinfectant made me nauseous again. No
matter where I went, the smell followed me, clung to me. I
paused by a large window and watched planes taking off. I

[p. <i>98</i>]

I pulled the flush. The water came, hitting the bowl with
the impact of a breaking dam. Or at least that's what it
seemed like to me. To a normal person — a person not
enslaved to DTs, a person who wasn't vomiting blood, a
person who wasn't thinking that a cold beer would solve
all of this, a person who wouldn't dream of getting on a
seven-hour flight if they were vomiting blood — it would
have just been a toilet flushing.


When the plane took off, I turned to the woman sitting
next to me. She was in her forties: fresh faced, healthy skin
glow, bright eyes, well-kept hair, nails, everything. She
smiled. I looked away and pressed my head against the
window. It was cool against my cheek. I imagined that it
was a snowball melting in the cauldron of raw, burning
pain in the pit of my stomach. My eyelids were heavy. We
were in steep ascent. Barely off the ground. The Fasten
Seatbelts lights glowed in authoritative red above every
seat. The nausea got worse. I unfastened the seatbelt.
Excuse me, I mumbled. The woman shifted her legs. I
clambered over them. Two stewardesses told me to go
back to my seat. I shoved past them, pointing at my
stomach. I waved away their offers of a sick bag and

[p. <i>99</i>]

I went back to my seat. Caught my breath. Buzzed for a
stewardess and asked for a glass of milk. Feeling a bit
queasy? she said, handing me a carton of milk. Milk had
never tasted so vile, so overpowering. I sat back and closed
my eyes. I let my head slump against the window. I was
woken seven hours later by a violent landing, one of those
landings where the plane bounces a few times before its
wheels find the grip they're looking for. I rubbed my face.
The woman next to me shot me a ‘glad to see you're still
alive’ look.


Mike was the first to land a job. Three weeks after
graduation he was hired by a shipping company as a
trainee account manager. I was sending out hundreds of
CVs and letters. Each morning over breakfast, I picked
through a stack of form letters that all climaxed with the
impersonality of a stamped signature. After a summer
spent collecting unemployment benefit, I ended up working
for a month in a record store before taking a job
working nights and weekends with a telephone market
research company in West London. The work was good
for me — the structure, the focus. When I got back from
New York, instead of seeing my doctor, I had put everything
down to too many cigarettes and too much bourbon.
I quit smoking as soon as I got off the plane and made a
new drinking rule: no spirits, no lager, no bitter — just
Guinness and wine.

[p. <i>100</i>]

Jane could tell I was in a bad way. My stomach was
hurting again and my hands were trembling. I was overweight.
Dennis kept teasing me, saying I looked like I was
five months pregnant.


‘Are you OK?’ she asked.


The shittiest February weather imaginable bore down
on us.


‘Sort of.’


I was on a sabbatical from the telephone job because I'd
been hired as a temp on a six-week market research
project for British Rail. I was working with another
graduate — Jane — and our job was to ride the train from
Euston to Birmingham and back, twice a day, seven days a
week, interviewing passengers about how they rated the
rail line.


‘Another hangover?’


‘Yup.’


I made a joke out of turning up for work everyday hung
over.


‘You look very pale. Do you feel all right?’


We were walking around Birmingham on a break.


‘Not really,’ I told her. ‘I feel terrible.’


‘Look, here's a sandwich place. Let's get something to
eat.’


After eating, I felt better.


‘You've got your colour back now,’ she said. ‘You had
me worried for a minute.’


Another lunch time in Birmingham, Jane dragged me to
see a palm reader who, aside from telling me things about
my life that no one could possibly know, told me I was

[p. <i>101</i>]

<i>Creak</i>. I woke up with a jump. There was someone on the
stairs. I put my bedside light on. <i>Creak</i>. There it was again.
I'd gone to bed early because all day at work a savage
hangover had been beating me with sticks. My parents
and sister were away on holiday — I hadn't been away with
them since I turned seventeen. I thought my mind was
playing tricks on me. I hadn't drunk a drop of alcohol all
night. I figured it was just another dose of the DTs. <i>Creak</i>.
This time closer, louder. I threw back the covers and got
out of bed. Whoever it is, I thought, is almost at the top of
the stairs. Burglars? I grabbed an empty wine bottle — a
relic from another night — from the window sill. Who's
there? I yelled. Who is it? Silence. <i>Creak</i>. I crept to the
door. I listened for a sound. Nothing. I pulled the door
open, ready to swing the bottle like a bat, and ran the four
or five paces through the dark to my parents' room. I
heard the shuffle of footsteps and then the kitchen door
rattled at the foot of the stairs. I locked the door behind me
and, using the phone by their bed, called the police.


There's no one here, said one of the six police officers
encircling me. They had arrived like a cavalry dispatch: a
riot van, a squad car, blue flashing lights, torches, batons.

[p. <i>102</i>]

Someone was on the stairs, I said. I heard them. They shot
each other coded looks. Are you alone tonight? asked the
one in charge. Yes, I said and then realised what he was
getting at. We've searched the house and the garden, he
said. There's no sign of forced entry. Call us if you have
any more trouble. I thanked them and they filed out to
their vehicles. I sat down on the stairs. What now? Have I
gone crazy?


I went into the kitchen, scooped up a wine box, grabbed
a glass and went into the lounge. I sat down, poured
myself a glass of white wine. I lifted it with a shaking hand
and downed it with one quick twist of my hand. I kept
filling it up. Four glasses of wine in as many minutes and
my nerves stopped howling. I suddenly realised that the
police hadn't checked the cupboard under the stairs. I ran
and got a knife from the kitchen. With four glasses of wine
in my body, I tore open the door, ready for anything. I
waited for the surprise, the attack. Instead: nothing but a
basket of potatoes staring back at me. I started to laugh,
first under my breath and then out loud. Potatoes. I'm
afraid of potatoes.


‘Was this a good idea?’ Laura asked, slurping her umpteenth
glass of wine.


As usual, we had got back in touch after a spell of not
talking. One of us always called the other, just when it
seemed we were slipping away forever.


‘Is it ever a good idea?’


We tended to meet up, have a good time, get drunk,

[p. <i>103</i>]

‘I guess not,’ she said and topped our glasses up.


‘So why do we keep doing it?’ I asked. ‘You don't want
to get back together. So what are these nights about?’


She giggled.


‘Oh,’ I said. ‘It's just sex is it?’


She looked tired. It was all the drinking. She drank every
night now too.


‘Of course not,’ she said and kissed me.


The drive down to Cardiff was long and arduous. To pass
the time, I bought twelve cans of Guinness. I also had a
Mediterranean cookbook, a pair of scissors and some
adhesive tape with me. I have no idea where I got these
things or why I had them with me. Dennis was driving.
Paul, now back in Cardiff getting ready to re-take his final
year, was throwing a party at his house that Saturday
night. He wanted us to go. I was starting my first serious
career job on Monday morning. I had taken a post selling
advertising space for a business magazine. I was probably
offered the job because I had been sober for twelve days
when I went to the interview. This latest attempt at
quitting was prompted, as always, by another blood-vomiting
footnote to a period of excessive, abusive drinking.
At the interview, I was centred and reliable, good-humoured
and sharp and the interviewers — seduced by my
performance — offered me the job on the spot.


For the entire journey, I drank and made mobiles out of

[p. <i>104</i>]

We got to Paul's house sometime after 8pm. I had drunk
all twelve cans of Guinness. We went out to a nearby pub
for four or five pints. When the party started at closing
time, I was too drunk to even hold a conversation. I got
into an argument with Dennis about whether or not we
were even in Wales. I kept insisting that we were in
Scotland. He got irritated with me and we went into
Dennis's bedroom to have a full-blown argument. It ended
when Dennis discovered that there was a roof terrace
outside Paul's bedroom windows. He said he wanted to
move all the furniture out there — long since his established
party trick.


We locked the door and spent the next two hours
humping chests of drawers, bookcases, lamps, a desk,
chairs and so on out through the windows. Passers-by in
the street stood pointing up at this spectacle, which only
made us work harder. When everything bar the bed was
out on the terrace, we went back to arguing about whether
we were in Wales or Scotland.


Eventually, we got bored and Dennis went back to the
party. I grabbed a blanket and lay down on the carpet and
went to sleep. There was a huge commotion sometime

[p. <i>105</i>]

‘What's the problem?’ I asked, barely conscious.


‘My entire bedroom is out on the terrace and it's fucking
raining!’ yelled Paul.


I sat up.


It <i>was</i> raining, really pouring.


‘So what?’ I said and pulled the cover over my head.


In the good old days, on the great drinking nights, there
used to be a point where magic took over the evening. I
used to say it was like that strong-man game at a fair
where you strike the target with a sledge-hammer and, if
you're lucky, the bell rings and you win a prize. The bell
rang at different times on different nights. Some nights it
rang twice, some nights not at all. I always drank in the
hope of making the bell ring. By this time, though, most of
my drinking nights were the same: me, tired and unhealthy,
repeatedly slamming that sledge-hammer down,
the bell rarely, if ever, ringing any more.


It felt like an ego trip to have my own stapler, my own
ruler, my own Tippex, my own box of elastic bands, my
own Biros and pencils, my own filing cabinet, my own
chair — one that swivelled — my own desk, even my own
telephone. I'd made it. No more nights and weekends

[p. <i>106</i>]

Really, though, all I thought about was how long until I
could drink. When would I get home? When would I be
free to start drinking? How much could I drink and still
drive into work? How much drinking could I get away
with and still go in and do the required day's work? If I
was too hung over to do much at work one day, then I
would taper off my boozing that night and show up fresh-faced
and jittery the next day and so on. If I drank too little
and turned up to work the next day in a state of minor
withdrawal, then I made sure I had a beer at lunch time. If
I had an especially bad hangover, then I also had a beer for
lunch: sometimes two pints of Guinness, sometimes two
and a half — I never strayed beyond this, though, for fear of
getting busted for drinking and driving.


Week nights were all the same. Long, sad stretches of
drinking alone. My parents in bed, my sister on the phone
in her room. Me, in front of the TV, drinking red wine,
watching <i>St Elmo's Fire</i> on video. I must have watched
that film once or twice a week for the whole of 1993. I
kept it a secret though. Like being an alcoholic, it wasn't
something I wanted to get out.

[p. <i>107</i>]

When the magazine broke sales records — mostly thanks to
me — the Group Publisher of our division organised a
‘reward’ dinner for everyone. He also invited the company's
board of directors who between them oversaw two
hundred magazines. By the time we got to the restaurant, I
was already half cut because my sales team had been to the
pub at lunch time and then to another pub after work.
After countless glasses of wine and a dessert that I passed
on, someone from Editorial started a food fight. Within
seconds, food was flying in all directions. When a piece of
tomato struck my white shirt, I grabbed a large jug of
cream and flung it in the direction of the Editorial table.
My perception of space and time, hopelessly wrecked by
how drunk I was, caused my arm to catch on a full bottle
of wine which tipped over and flooded the table. The jug's
contents — now redirected — splattered the face of the cigar-puffing
Group Publisher. It was a disaster that played out
in slow motion. A collective forty-strong sigh followed,
then torturous silence. Cutlery rattled. There was a lot of
whispering. I staggered out of the restaurant and collapsed
on the pavement outside. Cars whizzed by. I was so
smashed I couldn't get up. I knew my parents were coming
to collect me. I just couldn't remember when.


When I showed up on Monday morning, my manager
laughed and said, ‘My oh my, did we make a spectacle of
ourselves!?’ I waited for the ‘Can you come into my office’
speech but it didn't come. Instead I found myself at the centre
of the company's gossip machine. People buzzed around me
all day, asking me to re-tell the story, asking for details.

[p. <i>108</i>]

A light rain was falling outside the lounge windows. The
kind of late autumnal rain that comes and goes without a
great deal of fuss. I wiped the last of many tears from my
face. I didn't even know why I was crying. It came out of
nowhere. Two empty wine bottles on the table beside me.
Nobody home. My only company the sound of some stupid
bird chirping outside. It was 2 am. I was due at work at nine.
A dark velvety blanket lay sleeping over everything. I was
the only one on the street who was still awake. All of the
other lights had gone out one by one, the last disappearing
sometime after 1 am. I was tired and melancholic, dwelling
on old memories that I couldn't let go of. I picked up the
third bottle of wine and held it up to the light. Three, maybe
four glasses to go and then there wouldn't be a drop left. The
clock ticked away in the corner, reminding me that I was
wasting my life with the drinking thing. But it was too late
already. I couldn't shake it off. I caught my reflection in the
window and sighed. I'm still here. Sack of bones. Bloodshot
eyes. Bloated stomach. Puffy face. No amount of alcohol
can get rid of me. I re-filled my glass and poured it into my
mouth, hoping something might change.

[p. <i>109</i>]

A few weeks later, I was finishing a second bottle of wine,
alone in my bedroom, when the door swung open and my
sister and mother burst in like the FBI in a bad made-for-TV
movie. I spun around in my chair, a glass of wine — the
evidence, the proof —in my hand.


‘What?’ I barked.


‘We've got to talk,’ my sister said. ‘You're drinking too
much.’


‘No I'm not,’ my slurring as usual contradicting me.


‘You are,’ added my mother. ‘It's out of control.’


‘And don't take this the wrong way, but you're getting
fat and it doesn't suit you,’ followed my sister.


Fat?


‘Nick,’ my sister said. ‘You're drinking a ridiculous
amount every night. It's not normal.’


I'd been caught in the act. A bottle of wine on the desk.
A glass in my hand. Unhappy. Overweight. Sickly. They
were right. I looked like shit.


‘You're not to have any more wine tonight,’ cautioned
my mother. ‘You've got to do something with your life.
You can't sit in here night after night hiding away,
drinking all the time.’


It was true. I rarely went out at night any more. If I
drove anywhere, I couldn't drink...


Can you both leave now, please?'


They pulled the door shut. I topped up my glass.
Fat? I stood in front of the mirrored doors on the
wardrobe.

[p. <i>110</i>]

By winter 1993, I no longer drank to get drunk nor did I
drink to medicate my problems. I only drank for one
reason: to feel normal. I didn't enjoy drinking any more. It
wasn't even fun. When I was sober, I wasn't myself. I felt
like someone else. I vaguely remembered what I should
feel like — my natural state — and when I drank I returned
to this image of who I thought I was. It was a crazy
inversion, a mystical process whereby my sober and
drinking personalities had swapped identities. Once I
drank to get away from myself. Now I drank to return
to myself. The more I realised this, the more terrified I
became of my drinking. I was always trying to quit, always
trying to find a way to punish myself enough so that I
would be shocked into dropping the habit and starting a
new life. The problem was, as soon as I was sober, I missed
myself. I was like a rabid dog chasing my tail under a hot
sun, my whole life a circus of circles.


There'd been more blood. A lot of it. Like New York. This
time I'd done the sensible thing and gone to see my doctor.
He checked me over, asked me questions about drinking (all
of which I deflected with lies) and then wrapped up our
appointment, saying, ‘You'll have to lay off all alcohol for
six weeks.’ No matter how much I tried to trick my body, by
quitting smoking or drinking coffee or by staying sober for a
few nights, I was able to drink for fewer and fewer consecutive
nights before getting sick and spitting blood.

[p. <i>111</i>]

‘Who the fuck are you?’ I whispered.


Five or six old men were standing around my bed, looking
down on me. I turned my bedside light on and then they
vanished. The DTs had my head clamped tight in a vice and
the craving tightened it a little more each day. I had snakes in
my elbows and ants in my knees. Each sober day was as long
as seven drinking days. Time seemed perverse, sinister. I was
paranoid and jumpy. At work, I thought everyone was
talking about me behind my back. When I could get to
sleep, I had nightmares of packs of dogs chasing me. And
there were the hallucinations, the visitations from those
creepy old men. My brain was overheating, smoking,
steaming. One night, I went swimming to try and burn
off some of the withdrawal. I swam lengths, stopping after
each one to cling to the end of the pool and gasp for air. My
body was almost bankrupt. I had a funeral in my blood, my
arteries little white crosses in a field of green.


The pub. Drinking with Dennis. After I'd drunk five or six
pints, I told him how angry I was that I'd slipped after only

[p. <i>112</i>]

I was back at the medical centre within two months after
vomiting a scary amount of blood again. As always, the
spitting, the minor vomiting of blood didn't bother me,
but the big ones did. Same routine. Hi, me again. Poor
doctor, his heart sinking every time he set eyes on me.
More medication. Same pills as last time. Higher dose
though. Plus some liquid medicine. Another dull game of
doctor-and-patient tennis. His prying questions had me
running all over the court. But I hit my answers back so
hard that he only saw chalk dust. His ace: no drinking for
ten weeks. Meanwhile, I was off work again too. My
book of excuses was wearing thin. The flu. Food poisoning.
Car trouble. Mystery stomach bug. I'd used them all
up.


Ten weeks? I set my brain to work on defining his ban.
Was that ten weeks, as in ten working weeks — fifty days?
Or ten full seven-day weeks? Ten weeks. Two and a half

[p. <i>113</i>]

When an exact calendar month was over, I started
drinking again. I had an ingenious ruse to justify this
latest slip: from now on, I'd only drink on Friday and
Saturday nights. The new regime kicked in. I swam most
nights after work and never drank between Sunday and
Thursday but then ... every Friday and Saturday, out
with Mike or Dennis, there was carnage.


At the start of 1994, I was promoted again, this time to an
ailing monthly business magazine, based at a different
office. It was weird. The more erratic my moods got, the
more ads I sold, and the more ads I sold, the more I got
promoted. No matter how fucked up I was, I kept getting
promoted. It was a ridiculous endorsement of a ridiculous
life. To ‘celebrate’, I let my weekend drinking rule slip.


‘What are you doing?’


Caught red-handed. Me on the stairs in the dark with
another glass of wine in my hand. My mother, eyes

[p. <i>114</i>]

‘Nothing.’


I was so drunk that I had to work really hard not to
sound drunk.


‘You've had enough. Now get to bed.’


Enough? I don't know what that means ...


A supermarket checkout. 6 pm. The woman behind me in
the queue playing with her long, black hair. Her selection
on the conveyer belt: milk, two bottles of Evian water,
high-fibre bread, low-fat yoghurt, lettuce, cottage cheese,
apples, bananas. I remember these details because I made a
note in my journal about it. I watched my selection — six
bottles of red wine and a few microwave dinners that
always tasted like plastic — clink its way down the conveyer
belt. When the cashier handed me the slip to sign,
my hands were trembling so violently I had to fight to keep
the pen between my fingers. I pushed down hard, the point
of the pen almost tearing the paper. Two or so miles down
the road, I wound the window down, ripped off my tie and
drove on as fast as I could, cutting up one car after another
until I was home and it was dark and I had sedated myself
and was sitting alone in the dark, listening to the same sad
song on repeat on headphones, drunk to hell, carefree,
gone from here.

[p. <i>115</i>]

My mother became the main obstacle to a night's drinking.
Her tendency to burst from their bedroom and catch me with a
re-fill on the stairs was becoming a real problem. So, I came up
with a cunning plan. I'd come home from work and drink a
bottle of wine in front of the TV, talking with my parents and
sister. Eventually, my parents would head up to bed and my
sister would get on the phone with her boyfriend. I'd pretend
to go up to my bedroom and listen to music on headphones. I'd
wait until my parents' light went out and then I'd go downstairs.
Everyone in my family took a glass of water to bed. So
I'd creep downstairs, open a second bottle of wine, pour a glass
and then fill a pint glass with water. I'd hide the glass of wine by
my left side, so that it was shielded in the dark and then I'd hold
the water glass in full view with my right hand. When my
mother popped out of their bedroom, ready to catch me, I'd
say, ‘What? I just wanted another glass of water.’ She would
mumble something and go back to bed. Sometimes, I would
get sloppy and leave the corkscrew lying on the counter top.
‘Why did you open another bottle?’ my parents would ask
over breakfast. ‘When did you drink it?’ After several of these
interrogations, I took to hiding empty wine bottles in my
wardrobe and then dumping them at the weekends — in
recycling bottle banks — when my parents were out shopping.


‘What are we doing up here?’


Dennis, like me, was soaked to the bone.


‘I have no idea.’

[p. <i>116</i>]

We were standing on the steps of the Sacré-Coeur
cathedral. All of Paris below us. Lights. Candles burning
brightly. Silly flames. Attention-seeking golds and don't-look-at-me
yellows. We'd arrived in Paris that morning
for a weekend break, having drunk ten pints the night
before and soothed our red eyes with breakfast bloody
Marys at Heathrow. We walked all day, stopping for a
drink here, a drink there, before splitting two bottles of red
wine for dinner. Then the rain came.


What drew me to the Sacré-Coeur? I can't really say.
There was a strong pull though. A tug in my gut. I had no
idea where I was leading us and yet I knew exactly where I
was leading us. Past the whores in Pigalle, past the smoky
bars. Raindrops clung to the tips of our noses. The climb to
the cathedral nearly killed me. But when we got there, the
cathedral door was welcoming. I stepped inside. Incense.
The candles. The Mass in full flow. The choir. The scale of
everything. Heads bowed. Prayers, wishes.


A need for forgiveness throbbed in my neck. I was wet
with shame. I knew I had to stop. Or it would stop me. I
didn't want to die. I just wanted peace of mind. My eyelids
were heavy. My head dropped forwards. I could have been
anywhere. Far away. Floating. Daydreaming. I started to
pray. I was surprised by this. Shocked even. I cut a deal. A
plea deal. I promised to change my whole life if God —
whoever, whatever — helped me to stop drinking. I prayed
for a long time. There were so many things that I wanted
to confess. Sins. Repentance. And then, when I was all
talked out, the tears came. When I went back outside, I
found Dennis hanging over the railings, smoking. We
walked in silence back to our hotel. I knew he had seen
me. Face in hands. Shoulders heaving. Penitent fool.

[p. <i>117</i>]

The next day. 5pm. Happy Hour at Harry's Bar. Long Island
Iced Tea cocktails. More drinks at Café Deux Magots.
Cocktails at a club in the Latin Quarter. Dennis and I spent
£250 on drinks that night. The contract I signed at Sacré-Coeur
was torn up and thrown in the gutter. In the early
hours of the morning, we were drinking with some French
women. I bought a round of cocktails. I climbed up on to the
leather couches, trying to sneak behind Dennis and return to
my seat. God knocked me off my feet. I splattered across the
table. I was winded but all I cared about was keeping a tight
grip on the drinks. I didn't spill a drop. I hurt my back but all
five cocktails remained just as they'd been poured.


When I got home, the wine kept flowing. Every single
night. No let up. The party was never ending. I forgot all
about the Sacré-Coeur. My bottoming out. My confession.
Then, once more, pathetic and repetitive: blood in
the toilet bowl. Streaks. Blobs. Strings. I saw a message
written in blood: stop this before it's too late. I went to see
the doctor. This time, he stared searchingly at me and
asked me if there was ‘something’ he should know about. I
shook my head, neglecting to tell him that I could no
longer even drink unless I had the following to hand: a
sachet of Resolve, a packet of Rennies, a pint of milk, an
over-the-counter prescription for maximum strength Gastrocote,
antacids. I was medicating myself to prolong my
drinking life. He told me again that I shouldn't drink for

[p. <i>118</i>]

June 1994. Mike had organised a reunion. We met at a
pub in New Cross. The one next to Goldsmiths. The one I
had drunk in for three years. Standing at the bar, it was
hard to ask for a tonic water.


‘What's that?’ asked one supposed old friend after
another.


‘Toxic Water,’ I said, making fun of my situation.


I found these nights easier too if I pretended that soft
drinks were the drinks I'd rather be drinking. Ginger ale was
Jack Daniels, bitter lemon a margarita, cranberry juice a
glass of red wine, lemonade a glass of white wine, Coca-Cola
a rum and a coke, tomato juice a bloody Mary and so on.


It was one thing for me to deal with not drinking. Quite
another for my friends to. Their mourning took the form
of endless drinking stories.


‘One night when we were in here, Nick threw up all
over the table we were sitting at,’ said Mike, slurring. ‘It
was that table just through those doors by the jukebox.
He'd drunk eleven pints with eleven shots of Jack Daniels.
Everyone stared at him because it was a Saturday night
and packed in here. Then he got up, walked out of the
pub. I followed him, thinking he wanted to go back to my
place because he felt so ill. Instead he walked straight into
the wine bar over the road and ordered a bottle of red

[p. <i>119</i>]

I missed me too. I was staying in a lot, watching TV,
watching videos, playing guitar. I was swimming two,
three nights a week. I was burying my head in a lot of
work, using it as a distraction. I'd been promoted again to
another monthly magazine based in a new office in West
London. My ad manager had graduated from Goldsmiths
at the same time as me. He had been on Laura's course.
They knew each other. Outside work, I was going out on
long bicycle rides, trying to clear my head. I was sick of
getting sick. I wanted it to stop. I hadn't made any big
decisions though. I hadn't quit drinking as far as I was
concerned. I was just giving my body the time it needed to
heal. I believed that once I was better, I would be able to go
back to drinking like I did in the old days.


Mike finished another story. Everyone was doubled over
with laughter. I wasn't listening. Sobriety gave every part
of my life a surreal glaze. Watching them get drunk was
odd. They seemed stupid, loud, irritating. I felt boring,
estranged from the ‘me’ in the stories that Mike was
telling. I pulled a cigarette from a pack on the table.


‘What are you doing?’ Mike asked, a part of him
thrilled to see me screwing up again. ‘You haven't had
a cigarette for two years!’


I put it between my lips, lit it, inhaled ... and within
forty-eight hours, was back on twenty a day.

[p. <i>120</i>]

One day followed another until I was six weeks sober. I
stuck it out. I was relieved when my stomach stopped
hurting. I was relieved when the nightmares stopped. I
started to see waking up in the morning without a hangover
or that permanent grogginess as something good. I went
swimming and cycling as often as I could. I kept channelling
the craving, the anger, the frustration into exercise. Burning
it out of me. Using the pool or open roads to listen to my
emotions, to try to digest what I was feeling. I shed fourteen
pounds in the first six weeks. Everything was paring down.
There was a feeling that I was coming out from under a rock
after a long, long sleep. I could concentrate. I was able to
focus at work. I started reading again. I hadn't read a novel
since I graduated. My appetite whetted, I binged on books.
Jeffrey Eugenides's <i>The Virgin Suicides</i>. Jean-Paul Sartre's
<i>Nausea</i>. Jay McInerney's <i>Brightness Falls</i>. J.D. Salinger's
<i>Raise High the Roof Beam, Carpenters</i>. Reading brought
back an avalanche of memories. School. Elizabeth. The
library. My gap year. Laura. Exams. Veronica.


Early September. More than three months sober. My
sobriety on auto-pilot. I was now the ad manager of
the magazine — my Goldsmiths comrade had gone back
to university. I was responsible for three members of staff
and an annual turnover of £400,000. I was told that, at
the age of twenty-three, I was the youngest ad manager in
the company's history.

[p. <i>121</i>]

‘Let's go and get a bottle of wine.’


I was sitting with Maria in her flat in Hackney. She had
called me the night before. We hadn't seen each other in
over a year.


‘Don't: be stupid!’ she said. ‘You've just spent an hour
telling me how you've been sober for 112 days and how
much better you feel!’


I wanted a drink. The craving was gigantic, bigger than
oceans.


‘Who cares what I said? I'm through with this. It's so
fucking boring.’


And that was that. No one could have stopped me.


When I drank the last of the wine — Maria was sipping cider
— I sat back in the sofa and realised what I'd done. For the
first few sips, there was a flash of that old giddiness, ecstasy,
that holy anaesthetic. But then it vanished. It was like I
picked up where I'd left off. This bottle of wine followed the
bottle of wine I'd had the night before: the 112 nights in
between were erased. All that hard work, crushed and
flattened beneath the enormity. Of my need. Of my hunger.
Of my thirst. I had to have it ...


The wine slung its noose around my neck. I said I needed
to go to the toilet. I couldn't stand her looking at me that
way any more. I went upstairs and locked myself in her
bathroom. I looked for a razor blade. I saw a pink
disposable razor by the taps of the bath. I picked it up.
I hadn't cut myself in a long time. I couldn't even remember
the last time I'd done it. The urge returned.

[p. <i>122</i>]

<i>KNOCK. KNOCK</i>.


‘Nick? Are you OK? You've been in there for ages.’


I put the razor back on the bath tub.


‘Hang on.’


I opened the door. She looked worried.


‘What were you doing?’


I stared blankly at her. I had no idea.


I went to see a film — <i>When a Man Loves a Woman</i> —
about an alcoholic who cracks up and quits drinking. I
made a long journal entry that night about how much I
identified with the character. When she says something
about ‘needing to learn to live in reality’ once she's sober, I
knew exactly what she was talking about. I had no idea
how to live in reality. I was still angry with myself for
slipping at Maria's place. I'd gone through another severe
withdrawal. Back at work on Monday morning, another
ad manager who sat behind me asked me what I'd done at
the weekened. I told him I'd been to see the film.


‘Oh right,’ he said. ‘I heard something about that on the
radio this morning.’


He eyed me suspiciously. ‘I think the penny's starting to
drop.’


‘About what?’


‘You know,’ he said smirking.


I lit a cigarette and buried my head in paper.

[p. <i>123</i>]

In early October, Maria called to tell me that she was
about to move to Philadelphia for a year to work as an <i>au
pair</i>. She said she wanted to see me before she left. I
suggested that we drive down to Bournemouth, spend a
night in a hotel, go for a midnight walk along the sea-front.


‘I'm glad you're not drinking,’ she said, as we tore down
a stretch of open motorway.


‘Really?’ I said, unsure what I thought about it.


We checked into a hotel and then went downstairs to the
bar. I was going to order a toxic water but my veins staged
a revolt and stole my mouth long enough to make it say,
‘A double vodka with grapefruit juice please.’


‘Oh no,’ Maria said.‘Not again. You said that after
what happened the last time you saw me, you were never
going to drink again.’


The barman set about fixing the drink. I ignored her.
What did she know?


‘Have you gone crazy?’, she said.


‘Yes,’ I answered.


I didn't: care any more.


By 10 pm I'd drunk a lot but I wasn't drunk. I just felt normal
again. I was mid-way through a pint of beer when a cold
sweat ambushed me. Everything went black for a split-second.
I lost consciousness. It was like taking a little nap.


‘Are you all right?’ I heard her saying as I came back.


‘I need to go to the toilet.’


I stood in front of the mirror. I was dripping with sweat
and my skin was grey. Waves of nausea. Stabbing stomach

[p. <i>124</i>]

‘Better?’ she said.


‘I'm fine. I don't know what that was all about.’


She looked frightened.


‘Let's go back to the hotel,’ she said. ‘You've had
enough to drink.’


I felt better once we hit fresh air and I told her that I
thought the beer I'd been drinking was off and that it upset
my stomach. I used this absurd excuse to convince her to
join me in the hotel bar where I went back to what I knew
worked: double vodkas with grapefruit juice.


Two weeks later, I got drunk for the last time. Chianti
drunk. My mouth was stretched in a grimace so tense that
my jaw hurt. The sky had the colours of a funeral. It was
Sunday 23 October 1994. Freezing cold and depressing. It
was my mother's birthday. I pointed three bottles of red
wine at myself like they were loaded guns. I watched the
wine sigh in the glass like blood. The Chianti picked
through my brain like a mortician. Faulty circuits lay
lifeless. Loose cables were limp and colourless. When
the mortician was finished, my eyes were black as death.


I woke up dead on Monday morning. I had a glass of
Resolve for breakfast. I couldn't face eating anything. I

[p. <i>125</i>]

On Tuesday, the hangover was even worse. I was trapped in
the hangover version of <i>Groundhog Day</i>. I sat at my desk,
chain-smoking. One person after another came over to ask
if I had the flu. No, I'm fine, I lied on auto-repeat, until it was
time to go home. Sometime after 8 pm, as I sat in front of a
re-run episode of <i>Thirtysomething</i>, the DTs came with their
baseball bats and knives and chains and clubs. It started
with twitches in my legs and arms. The floor sliding one way
and then the other. The TV screen got blurry. There were
heart palpitations. Icy beads of sweat dribbling down my
sides. Teeth clenched. A seizure in my shoulders. Clammy
palms. A spasm in my left leg causing it to spring up into the
air. The chair I was sitting in shrank. The TV looked no
bigger than a matchbox. My lungs were sticky. I put my
head between my knees. Trembling, shivering. Burning up.
So hot. I held my hands out. They were shaking like plates in
an earthquake. I bit down on my tongue. I pressed my feet
hard against the ground, one hand gripping the armchair,
the other tugging at my lips, scratching my cheek, rubbing
my nose. My father came into the lounge. He asked me if I
was OK. I told him I needed a glass of wine. He got angry.


‘You're ashen,’ he said. ‘A drink's the last thing you need.’


My mother walked in, took one look at me and knew
something was very wrong. She asked me what the matter

[p. <i>126</i>]

‘What's wrong with me?’ I asked as soon as she took the
thermometer out.


‘I don't know,’ she said. ‘I'll be back in a moment.’


Every part of my body turned numb. I was drifting in and
out of consciousness. There was a moment of intolerable
pain and then I thought I was going to pass out. Then, out of
nowhere, hallucinations. Beautiful blue birds, everywhere,
against a misty backdrop of autumnal sky. Hundreds and
thousands of blue birds flying in slow motion. Passing over a
black lake. That was all I could see. Not my bedroom or the
desk or the chair or the stereo or the bedside drawers or the
mountain of CDs and records or the overflowing bookcase. I
snapped out of it. I saw myself in the wardrobe's mirrored
doors. Pale, sweaty, shivering. Then the nausea came. Bile
spilled into my mouth. I ran on rubbery legs to the bathroom.
I got there just in time. Blood again. All over the toilet bowl.
All over the toilet seat. Dangling from my chin. A string of
bloodied something that looked like spaghetti clung to the
side of the bowl. There were so many kinds of red: cherry red,
tomato red, raspberry red, strawberry red, sunset red,
bloody Mary red. I cleaned up and flushed the toilet.


‘What's going on?’ I heard my mother call.


‘I just threw up,’ I called back in a voice shot to pieces
from all the vomiting.


I cleaned my teeth and splashed cold water over my face

[p. <i>127</i>]

‘Are you OK?’ she said.


‘Not really,’ I told her. ‘I just vomited blood.’


The next morning, I got up for work like nothing was
wrong with me. There was no question of me going to see
a doctor. Ten weeks blah blah. I knew the drill. I was
scheduled to pick up one of the sales executives who
reported to me from a station close to work and then
we were going to drive to Birmingham for an exhibition.


‘Are you all right?’ he asked as he got into my car.


‘Yes, why?’


I had to keep pretences up. I was — after all — his manager.


‘You look peaky.’


‘Do I?’ I said, in a matter-of-fact tone, releasing the
hand-brake. ‘I feel fine.’


Less than five minutes of silent driving later, I had to
pull off the road.


‘Why are you stopping?’


I slammed on the brakes and threw my car door open. I
leaned out of the car and threw up on the tarmac.


‘Jesus Christ,’ he said, his voice faraway and fuzzy. ‘Are
you OK?’


I motioned to him with my hand to shut up. I vomited a
second time. Then I hit the retching stage. More blood,
shining on the tarmac in the crisp sun of the October morning.


‘Gary,’ I said, sitting back in my seat.


‘What?’

[p. <i>128</i>]

‘I'm going to have to go home.’


‘You need to see a doctor.’


<i>I need a drink</i>.


‘Can you pass me my cigarettes?’


‘Cigarettes?’ he said, astonished. ‘Is that really a good
idea?’


‘I guess not.’


I drove back to the station and dropped him off.


‘Will you see a doctor this morning?’


‘Maybe.’


Of course I didn't.


I lay awake all night shivering and shaking. I was sweating
so badly that at one point I had to go to the bathroom and
towel myself down. It was disgusting — like I'd just stepped
out of a shower during summertime in New York. As soon
as I towelled myself down, I was soaked again. Once I was
back in bed — after the second trip to the bathroom — my
body temperature dropped. Soon I was freezing cold: teeth
chattering, legs twitching, chest wet, doubled up with
stomach cramps. I curled up in a ball, desperate for the
pain to stop, my eyes snapped shut. Birds. Beautiful blue
birds. Take me with you.


I was so sick on Thursday morning — and I went into work
again — that I had to leave an hour after I got in. One of the

[p. <i>129</i>]

‘Nick,’ he said. ‘I think I should take you to hospital.
You need to get checked out. You look like crap.’


‘I'm fine,’ I said, not sure if I was trying to convince
myself or him. ‘It's just a stomach flu I can't shake off.’


An hour later, after almost blacking out in the office, I
was home, having driven all the way with double vision. I
was shaking so severely when I got home, that my mother
took me straight to the medical centre. My usual doctor
was fully booked so I saw another doctor. He told me I
had acute gastritis, prescribed me an anti-nausea drug and
an anti-acidity medication and then asked me how much I
drank. I said a few glasses a night. He said that was hard
to believe because I was suffering from a textbook case of
DTs. I asked him what he could do about it. He said there
was nothing that could be done — other than me stopping
drinking. I took the prescription and walked.


‘I think I have a brain tumour.’


Three days later I was back at the medical centre. My
doctor — my old, regular doctor — frowned. I told him I'd
been in bed ever since I saw the substitute doctor and that
I'd been having headaches, bad enough to convince myself
that I had a brain tumour. He shone a torch into both of
my eyes and asked me various questions. At the end of this
mini exam, he told me that no, I didn't have a brain
tumour. I'd seen far too many Woody Allen movies to take
a doctor's evaluation at face value. I asked how he could

[p. <i>130</i>]

‘Come back in ten days’, he concluded, throwing his
hands up in the air. ‘If you're still having problems.’


When I asked my mother where the ultra-violet sun lamp
was, she looked at me like I'd gone crazy — do you blame
her? I'd gone back to work. I think she hoped that that
would put an end to all my weirdness. She asked me why I
wanted it. As a child, I used the sun lamp — black goggles
clamped over my eyes — to try and drain blocked sinuses. I
said I wanted to give myself a suntan. So, resigned,
bemused, she told me where it was. I went upstairs, found
it, set it up, plugged it in. I was so sick of seeing my pale,
sickly face in the mirror that I figured that if I used the
lamp to give myself a fake suntan, then at least I'd only feel

[p. <i>131</i>]

I read an article about stress in one of the Sunday news-papers
and wondered if I was simply stressed out. The
article recommended vitamins and supplements which
might fight stress. I went to a supermarket and bought
a basket full of stuff: Kalms (to help me relax), zinc (to
combat depression), ginseng (to strengthen my immune
system), iron (for fatigue), a big bunch of bananas (because
the article said that bananas boosted the brain's
serotonin levels). Then, that afternoon, I went running. I
was out of breath before I even reached the end of the
street but I pushed myself, convinced that exercise would
help. After a bath, I sat in front of the UV lamp. I was
rattling with pills, full of bananas and my legs ached from
the run. Regardless, the sweats drenched me throughout
the night and the pain in my stomach was worse than ever.
The whole time, all I kept thinking was that there was only
one reason for getting better: so I could have a drink and
put an end to all of this.


‘You have to get to the emergency ward at this hospital,’
said my doctor, pointing to the name and address. ‘You
know where it is don't you?’


I nodded. I could see two of him. At 7:30 am I'd stood

[p. <i>132</i>]

‘Here,’ he added, thrusting an envelope into my hand.
‘And when you get there...and I've called ahead so they
know to expect you ... give this to the receptionist.’


‘Now hurry,’ he said, his voice pink with panic. ‘The
bleeding can become quite profuse and you must be under
medical supervision if that happens.’


He held the door open.


‘One last thing,’ he said as I turned to leave his surgery.
‘Whatever you do, don't drive yourself. Did someone
bring you here?’


‘No. I drove myself.’


I hadn't mentioned the ‘black stools’ to my parents. He
pulled a face of disbelief.


‘Listen, please call someone and have them take you to
the hospital. It's too dangerous for you to drive yourself.’


Traffic backed up all the way into a black sky. My
knuckles white against the bone. Fingers strangling the
steering wheel. It's too dangerous for you to drive yourself.
When I get there I know what they'll say. You can never
drink again. Sobriety. Forever. It's too dangerous for you
to drive yourself. My head swimming. Cars reduced to
smears of colour. I think of all the things that could go
wrong: I could run out of petrol. I could break down. A
tyre could blow out. The engine could overheat. Someone
could crash into me. It's too dangerous for you to drive
yourself. Teeth chattering like castanets. My heartbeat

[p. <i>133</i>]

Doctors, nurses and porters buzzed around me. I shivered
in the skimpy sky-blue hospital gown. The pain in my
stomach excruciating. Scissors, needles and pins limbo-danced
beneath my ribcage. A nurse wrote my name and
date of birth on a clear plastic bracelet and fastened it
around my wrist. She handed me consent forms and a pen
and asked me to read through the conditions and sign at

[p. <i>134</i>]

‘Where have all your veins gone?’ she joked.


She slipped the thorny needle into the back of my hand,
attached it to the drip and a cold saline fluid began to ooze
into my bloodstream.


‘I'm really scared,’ I said.


She smiled and then jabbed me with another needle and
took a blood sample.


‘Am I going to die?’ I asked as my blood mushroomed in
the syringe.


‘No, you're not going to die.’


She disappeared behind the curtains, leaving me alone
on the trolley bed.


A male doctor appeared with a nurse and began the
routine examinations. I felt like a dying dog, being jabbed
and stabbed and poked and prodded. There were no
words left inside me. I just growled when they touched
a part of me that hurt.


Next, a female doctor saw me alone. She had a kind face
and so many questions that I didn't want to answer.


‘How much do you drink each a day?’


‘A bottle of wine on average,’ I lied.


She didn't query what I said. She wrote down some
comments on a photocopied form that was clipped to a
chipped clip-board.


‘Do you smoke?’


‘I gave up a fortnight ago.’

[p. <i>135</i>]

No comment.


‘I haven't had a drink since then either,’ I added.


Still no comment.


I hadn't slept much either.


‘Are you still taking antidepressants?’


I wish.


‘No.’


‘Since when?’ she probed, not even raising her head
from the clip-board.


I stared at her. She looked up.


My memory was shot to pieces.


I couldn't remember.


My parents were sitting by my bed when I came round.
Earlier, I had been taken down to surgery for an exploratory
endoscopy. I gagged when they sprayed a local
anaesthetic on the back of my throat so they gave me a
general anaesthetic. When they shot me up, it was heaven.


‘How do you feel?’ they asked.


The anaesthetic was wearing off.


‘I wish I hadn't woken up.’


A group of student doctors flocked around my bed. A
specialist ran through his diagnosis. Internal bleeding.
Oesaphagitus. Gastritis. Duodenitus. One bleeding ulcer.
One weeping ulcer. High blood pressure. Mild anaemia.

[p. <i>136</i>]

There were other things too but I stopped listening. I knew
what was wrong. I knew what had caused all this. When
they finally left me alone, I turned on my side and faced the
wall, the hospital pillow rough against my cheek.


‘Why have you done this to yourself?’ the nurse asked as
she stood at the foot of my bed, shaking her head.


‘I don't know,’ I replied, and I didn't.


My voice was hoarse.


She shuffled back to the nurses' station.


A dim light shone from the end of the ward.


Why had I done this to myself? What was ‘this’?
Drinking enough to get hospitalised? Drinking enough
to almost kill myself?


The ward was silent apart from the sound of a respirator
pumping the man in the next bed's lungs for him.


Just before I fell asleep, a simple thought. I don't want to
die.


Not now.


Not tomorrow.


Not ever.

